He shouldn't have kept the fact that he loved her private.  
OMG thats like 100 jobs!!!!
dun dun dunnnnnnn!
Yeah, but he put his hand back up when the guy asked for Obama voters.  I think he was just [confused](http://images.google.com/images?source=ig&amp;hl=en&amp;rlz=&amp;=&amp;q=senior%20citizens%20butterfly%20ballot&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;sa=N&amp;tab=wi).
*"unusual"*??? ...that's right you're not from "**[Houston](http://www.flickr.com/photos/engrishisfun/sets/72157604986033326/show/ )**", *[But Texas wants you anyway](http://www.mp3lyrics.org/l/lyle-lovett/thats-right-youre-not-from-texas/ )*. (That's right you're not from Texas (But Texas wants you anyway.)
The Bush Administration defines condoms and abortion as [the same thing](http://digg.com/politics/Bush_Administration_is_Redefining_Contraception_As_Abortion) :(
There are more than two candidates. 
I did something similar, but with digital media. Basically a GD course with a digital spin. It was mostly useless, honestly. Their idea of web design was a spliced up image in dreamweaver, with javascript popups. This was to be our portfolio!   I finished that off, passed everything and wanted more web design SKILLZ so i self taught. Dreamweaver was a decent crutch but i think learning to code in Notepad++ is really a better way to do it.
I fail to see how notions of "suicide" work with non-reproducing drones of a non-sentient hive species.  As long as the queen, a couple of males and enough workers for a meal remain, the hive could sacrifice over 9000 drones daily and see no ill effect.  Ant's have evolved as a hive species for 100 million years. We should not place our flavor of psychology upon them.
"And it will be your job to maintain those robots."
Yep, stock brokers arent concerned about saving anything.
The 'script' being reality.
Maybe more people will ride bikes now.
So eat fast food until you keel over.  It is your life, spend it how you please.  Choosing 40 years of behavior that you like over 80 years of behavior that you dislike is perfectly valid.
Nice dude :)
...But it's becoming more relevant with every passing day.
http://www.newrules.org/voice2004/agriculture/cool.html
I just listened to Jim Carreys [speech](http://uk.youtube.com/watch?v=Nrm3qrZkzQw) about the issue.  As I understand from that they want independent studies made on vaccines. That doesn't seem too outrageous to me.  But as long as nothing further is researched to contest the vaccines I think it is a bad idea to go against the program.  I think antagonizing on both sides of the issue is making the thing into another war.  There is no talk about how the increase in autism is counted over the years. Is it because of better diagnosis or what?
Corporatism.
I wonder.  Surely we have the most advanced conscious of any species we know (well, at least we like to think we do).  But is it just black and white, meaning, either you're conscious of future or not?  It seems more likely that there are varying degrees of levels of conscious awareness, which would include future planning, depending on the creature. 
I hope you have seeds, you better start growing and claim your territory. Tax the fuck out of it and quit your job, a nice steady income is right around the corner.  Now if you lived in arizona I would hook you up buddy!
A better explanation is [here (pdf)](http://www.ucalgary.ca/~keith/Misc/AC%20talk%20MIT%20Sept%202008.pdf)  Basically  1. capture CO2 in a hydroxide to get a carbonate  2. calcine (roast it) to get pure CO2, and recycle the hydroxide.  3. pump the CO2 underground where it will stay for thousands of years (OK, I think, because this is the timescale on which CO2 is absorbed by oceans).  The thermodynamics work out because you are never breaking up the CO2.  A nifty idea - by sacrificing 10% of the energy from coal, you make it clean.  The problem is that the timescale for developing this will be similar to the timescale on which we run out of coal and oil, and the timescale on which we could develop more nukes or solar.  It's a bit like inventing horse-diapers to clean up the roads, just as Ford is starting to make the Model-T.  And the $200/person figure is attractive, but neglects capital investment.
Oh no, they got Hiromu Arakawa?  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hiromu_Arakawa  But I love Full Metal Alchemist. This better not fuck up series 2.
Can't access the full text - need to buy it?  here: http://psycnet.apa.org/journals/adb/22/3/380/
I still haven't heard a good argument as to WHY?  Why should we fix their mortgages.. Keep them in the homes they could not afford?  There are more responsible people waiting on the sidelines for the prices to drop so they can buy the house.   People who've been waiting because they knew they couldn't afford the absurd prices, and whom are now waiting because prices remain too high.  Bailing these people out to keep them in their home only reinforces the mentality that you can do the wrong thing and someone will be there to pat you on the back and say... "Its ok. Go back into debt, we'll help you again next time"  Its a big FUCK YOU to the people who were responsible.
No matter how this turns out, we are witnessing history in the making.
They don't need to invite experts to discuss it.  It's pretty obvious they have already decided what answer they want.
dude, i love that sub reddit...   I'm sure any serious music maker will too.
Dude, it's not the parents' responsibility to save for school. And it actually happens that mine did, but I'm not accepting their money. I'm paying market-rate interest on that money...though I did lock in a fixed rate of 6% a few years back :)
Eww.  NSFW.
I want to tea-bag Sean Hannity so badly.  
Nah...it goes both ways. I* put my Trevor Hoffman in to end close games because he's good at it. They call it a save. Now, I put my closer in because it will get him a save and the crowd expects to hear Hells Bells.  *Hypo: assumes I'm Bud Black
CAN YOU SURVIVE?
Honestly don't Italians have more important things to worry about?
Hmmm... I don't recall saying anything either way, other than the stock market is a profit making industry for those capable of navigating the currents of trading in a more and more automated format with little to no due diligence, just the stochastic charts a trader uses, and the overall value attributed to a particular analyst. I believe these are the same people that make up the 1% that control 35-45% of a US wealth depending on who you read/listen to.  We both know that a company may lose money, but if they had used their stock valuation to receive a loan, and they put it to use before the crash, it is hard to get that particular loan back based on the decline. They'd have to pay it back, or default, it really all depends on their business model. Pretty simple financial management processes there, seems a lot of companies have failed that class.
True, but looks like people sought him out to try out a job. I cant imagine the expectations for every week wouldve have been that hard.
It's psychologically addictive.  I was addicted to it at one point for a few years. Finally got off the stuff though.
Post Office Box 110001 Juneau, AK 99811-0001
Read the story on Yahoo about it. It's on the front page now. My reading of it is they're going to sweeten the deal, vote on it, then, assuming it passes, kick to the House to vote on it. Ultimately both houses have to approve it before it can go to the President.  I thought finance bills can only be started in the House, but maybe this is some kind of loophole or I was wrong or something.  EDIT: Here's the Yahoo link.  http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20080930/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/financial_meltdown_1711
I don't understand why everyone likes this guy. His TV show is stupid. Most of his tricks are really obvious, and some are just downright stupid. For example: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R5f8X2zjgxk
You're probably right :(
Just an anlogy that makes Sara Palin an executoner of Obama. I can't imagine anyone being upset if it was the other way around.
That tattoo on her pelvis means she has herpes... so I've read.
&gt;But the bill didn’t become law, for a simple reason: Democrats opposed it on a party-line vote in the committee, signaling that this would be a partisan issue. Republicans, tied in knots by the tight Democratic opposition, couldn’t even get the Senate to vote on the matter.  The senate committee was headed by and controlled by Republicans 11-9.  The congress was controlled by congress at the time.  If republicans saw this as impending doom at the time they clearly could have worked around 9 US senators.
That's what she said...
Katie Couric's face at 0:34 is priceless.
What the hell, this post was downmodded to 0 before it could even refresh after hitting Submit?
God that's a great idea
[[con-den-sation](http://sporko.com/videos/312/Family_Guy:_Condensation/)] sation-sation-sation...
The word suicide comes from the Latin "sui caedere" literally meaning "to kill oneself". Any action that one takes which will knowingly lead to the their death is suicide regardless of the motivation.
What existence do the cells of your body experience? How do you feel about your white blood cells fighting off infection, or your kidney cells processing wastes out of your body?  Ants are [superorganisms](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Superorganism). The queen, workers, and drones all play a part in the larger collective of the hive.   And most individuals of any species experience a life made up mostly of "work, toil, and death" anyway.
The last sentence of the article sums this whole race up sufficiently:  "The untruths are getting almost too convoluted to track at this point -- it's a bit like being trapped in a falsehood fun-house or something."  I sometimes feel like that when browsing through some of these articles. It's one twisted rhetoric after another. I'm going to be glad when this whole shit is over. Although, I'm afraid it will actually become even worse after November.
Actually, he used *his daughter* as the nude model. So I guess it says something about his daughter (not to mention their interesting relationship).
I hear you get some holidays, but that's about it.
On the way to fascism.
Maybe it goes towards schools and hospitals.
Yes.
If she said one of those, she'd be giving a clue into what helps frame her thinking, and alludes to political leanings.  Should could have pulled something like listing a left, center, and right paper... I like the way X and Y cover international issues from different perspectives, etc...  "I read whatever's in front me of" sounds like she might be about 4 years behind in NewsWeek while waiting for the Dentist, if she reads them at all
The staffing of my department would suggest otherwise.
No, I'm not talking about wealth, I'm not sure why you seem to think that I am.  You could always try defining your terms instead of assuming them.  Or perhaps you feel that the term "value" as used in economics is already universally defined and agreed upon.  (it isn't, btw, this has been an ongoing debate for as long as economics has existed as a discipline)  For the record, I take value to mean the relative worth, utility, or importance of something and I believe this amply covers monetary and relative commodity worth.  I think you will find that this definition coheres with everything I have said, and is also commonly used in the field of economics.  Anyway, you are probably correct that there is no point in continuing this dialogue.
This is kind of pointless America-bashing. Shipping bottled water from Fiji is stupid.  But this is not 'consuming at the expensive of other people', as the article states.   It's not as though we're taking the water away from these villages, we're taking it out of the ground on a completely different island from the village mentioned.  Fiji has no real natural resources, I'm not sure that it hurts them to have *something* to export.  
Oh, and just in case you still believe that, maybe give [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xRkWebP2Q0Y) a watch. I think you're vastly overestimating her ability to bullshit her way through a question.
Isn't that how AIDS spread?
That's surprising?
Bought my iPhone because it was the best way to mobilize my ability to use Remember the Milk.  It's also proven itself to be a useful feed reader in addition to having my emails on the go.  By the way, due to the casing on it, I may own the ugliest iPhone in the world. (I'm a little clumsy.)
not quite, but good effort. Heres a cookie. o
I hope she has a great career in a place where she meets the people's needs and they re-elect her.  I just don't want to be her trial run at office riding on the ticket and bad heart of someone else I also didn't vote for.
Because not everyone has the puritanical american 'oh my god, you exposed a nipple, you're going to hell' view about nudity, not everything is sexual, and we all have bodies within a range of similarity to each other.  Some people around the world are able to be adult, and civilised, and recognise that nudity is not something that has to be sexual and 'wrong'.
The difference is that physical media changes happen over a period of years, or never if the consumer never bothers to upgrade - *consumers* can decide on an individual basis when (or if) they want to re-buy the same media, and if they do upgrade there's usually some good, physical reason why their old media must be replaced (you couldn't sensibly design a CD which could also be read by an old tape drive, for example).  When the manufacturer turns off a DRM system it's at *their* discretion, not the individual consumer's.  They're basically forcing the consumer to re-buy all their music or immediately lose the lot.  One is a consumer choice, made whenever they want to.  The other is an executive decision, imposed on the consumer by fiat, without their consultation or consent.  I've personally witnessed non-technical users getting pissed off with DRM as soon as they understand why their existing DRMed tracks suddenly won't play with their new portable device... and in a way I've never seen anyone pissed off by gradual physical media changes over the course of years.  The technology's only a few years old, and it takes time for the general public to appreciate new developments like digital media.  Nevertheless, they reason by comparison to what they had before (physical media), and the fact that DRM imposes *unprecedented* and from-their-point-of-view *unnecessary* restrictions is slowly starting to piss off even the average guy in the street, though it'll probably still take another decade of more before people understand digital media as (comparatively) well as they do physical media.
It looks really cool, especially in the swank room.  The airflow design really sucks, though.  They should have kept the top and bottom sides of the box open and put fans all the way across the top.
Answer: Nothing. It just depends on what kind of socialist country you are. The US has been a socialist country for a long time, from 1933 to 1940 it was a socialist republic for the people but in an effort to win the war it became a military industry socialist republic geared to global hegemony. In the wake of the eventual collapse of the Soviet Union the socialist portion of the US extended to finance and insurance section of the economy with little or no support for the citizens.
She could have said *that*. That would have been a reasonable answer. In fact, I would have respected her more if she had said that.
What is this porno going to be called? "Nailin' Miss Palin"? "Veep Throat"? 
Tiffany Pollard is a beast, and this post is at best semi-coherent. 
Any small business that's running so far in the red that they need to use credit to make payroll is poorly managed and probably deserves to go under, just like all the large, poorly managed corporations that WOULD be going out of business if we didn't keep throwing fuel on the fire and rewarding their greedy foolishness.
358-55-0869 is mine *'s?
thank you
The point still stands...  ...even if your home value does drop to ~$70k.  BTW, the commen was composed to say:   &gt;+$70k  ...fscking markdown
Okay!  Thanks a ton for your help reddit.  But the contest is over.  You guys are great and I'll update and tell you if I've won/gotten 2nd place.  update: well, looks like I actually got 4th place overall.  Man, talk about Googlin' savants.  Thanks for the help, regardless!  You guys are awesome.
Great, thanks for the info, this must be the case.  I think you're right ... I must have gotten my 1/day from a specific species.
No, systemic fraud (i.e., deliberate misrepresentation) should not be allowed by a television broadcast organization on the public airwaves, *ESPECIALLY* when it constitutes an attempt to influence voting by use of fraud.  Voting fraud is rampant in the U.S..  There is no denying that.  RFK jr. has documented this.  The broadcast by Fox at issue here is an attempt to influence voters by use of fraud.  Your assertion that the more important issue is that we are free to "not watch it" is tantamount to asserting that if a crime occurs we are free to ignore it and therefor it is somehow OK if we choose to ignore it.  That is not either logical or morally acceptable to me.
I love Pantera. The others are far inferior. Metallica is far more musically diverse than any of them.   I bought my first guitar largely because I was a Metallica fan. I didn't have that same reaction the first time I heard Sepultura tune down their guitars to C, have a spasm, and growl.
I'd like to hear you dispute all of the points made in this video. http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-5386487651203625811
Such hubris... Here's a summary for you: FAP-FAP-FAP-OMG-COMPUTERS-FAP-FAP-IM-SO-SMART-FAP-FAP...
or curtailing voter fraud
that was a technical glitch in the nasdaq
But the markets demand it? Wait you mean markets don't know anything either it's all just a fiction we all agree on! Soylent Green is PEOPLE!
Yes, a function could of course read the datastructure. But you can't bind variables and execute arbitrary code within the lexical scope of these bindings with a function.
I for one welcome our new ant overlords...
Because American Spectator is such an elitist magazine.
Coming soon to YTMND
Saying the opposite of one's intended meaning for dramatic or comedic effect?
She should have said the National Enquirer. That would have been funny. 
I've been to that Dunkin in Scranton - I wish I was there to scream obscenities about Fox News
Metal can easily become coated with an oxide "rust".  For example, aluminum becomes quickly coated with a thin layer of oxide (makes it dull).  Maybe that is part of your problem.  Also, if the metal was touched *at all* before spray, kiss the coating goodbye.  You may need to use a solvent to clean it.  Isopropyl alcohol is a good final solvent step, though others may be necessary.  Finally, did you prime it first?
"Two hands put to work will achieve more than two thousand hands clasped in prayer.  Instead of pretending to help by praying, why not actually help by lending a hand?"
The truth of the matter is that that's how the lawyers will present it. 
&gt; Keep saying that we are not heavily regulated.  First off, I'm only talking about health care. Second, I'm only saying it's minimally regulated compared to the health care systems of other industrialized countries, which are all socialized.  &gt; No profit motive to work on unpatentable IP?  In health care, it appears that way.  &gt; Ever heard of GNU? Apache is free, yet I charge money to install it.  Yes, because computing and health care are exactly the same in every way.
Am i the only person who completely fucking hates this whole fail fad? "This is FAIL! You're made of FAIL! LOL! EPIC FAIL!!!"   Since when is looking grammatically retarded cool? it's not. You just look stupid. It's not funny or clever, it's just a substitute for those too lazy or those incapable of putting actual thought into what they say.
I have  a moderately religious mom and a non-religious dad (I don't think you could call him an atheist he just literally has no opinion on the matter and doesn't care) and I basically reached the conclusion that all religion was bull on my own after going to catholic grade middle and high-school.  I don't know if that counts for breaking free on my own but if there's one thing that helped, it's my pension for science and math over other subjects and therefore looking at the world from a scientific point of view.
is the mindkiller.
Hah, hope we did well. A few of those needed login information to finish off, unfortunately.  Damn interesting tho - an internet treasure hunt. Good idea.
The last line end in a question mark?
They should be found, extradited, tried, and put in jail, like normal thieving criminals.
Lots of people decry "election year politics" but it seems that's the only time anyone pays attention to what the voters think. I think all offices should be voted on every year. heck maybe every 6 months. 
What, don't you?  I mean, what are hard drives for if not to hold gigs and gigs of ball porn?
&gt;Due to its large size, it may be better suited to astronomy applications. Wow, really?
Not to undermine this thread, but [the other thread](http://www.reddit.com/r/programming/comments/74g1e/the_tragedy_of_linked_lists/) has some hilarious comments.
if by 'make them take down the portrait' you mean 'have the republican national guard storm in there in their nice new black uniforms, and arrest and/or shoot everyone involved' then yeah.  Oh, and trust me, the moment she's 'vice president', McCain will find himself having a series of heart-straining 'scares' that end up with a President Palin.
nice find
Stolen from [PCmag](http://www.pcmag.com/article2/0,2704,2331225,00.asp)
What? No bacon-reddit?
Ignore skinnymuch.
The discussion is pointless if you're going to deny reality.  Me: "Polemic' does not suggest dishonest intent..."  You: "It does."  You "I never said a polemicist has to be dishonest..."  When you're in a hole, stop digging. You were wrong and now you're making yourself look like a dick by denying what you clearly wrote.
Katie Couric obviously has a lot of respect for Palin.
Only 42%? That's down significantly from fifty years ago.
Everything... *in the world!*  Der Spiegel?  Yup, yup.  Le Monde?  Yup, yup.  Al Jazeera?  Yup, yup.  Asahi Shimbun?  Yup, yup.
They're preparing for HD content.
But Obama will raise taxes, and clearly that's all I give a fuck about, Merika, Fuck yeah
I think part of the point is that no particle is "hardly there." Any tiny particle is just as substantive as any other tiny particle in any other object. (or not in an object) One of my friends who studies quantum physics said -- once you go down far enough -- there aren't any distinctions anymore. Everything is made of the exact same stuff -- very, very, very tiny strands of energy. At least that's what some physicists theorize.
Yeah, they're going to other universities too.  Here's the [info](http://www.digitalliteracycontest.org/) on it.  Seriously, thanks a ton all of you.
I have only ever seen the latter.  When I see the former for the first time I will believe there are really two ways "I'll pray for you" can be intended.
Well if you people would upmod it instead it'd stay up and future potential story posters would remain potential.
Bear in mind that quack missed the word 'huskies' off the end of that sentence.
Depends on whether you're in an open relationship or not. If you're in a circular linked list, it doesn't matter if you're just two elements now...one day she may come home with a third boy-toy and it's up to you to not get jealous. Unless, you get her to agree to a double link and get a ring around that finger..
who gives a Palin?
Vote up if you think poop comes out of your butt.
Upvote for DC metro map.
The student made this award winning movie with only $180!!!
I love Blind Guardian. Demons and Wizards too. Also, Iced Earth.   I just can't see how people that love those bands think Death Magnetic is crap, unless it's because they're trying to look cool on the internet. 
I was 9 when I liked Bush. :-( (in 2000)
step 1: obtain small teacup step 2: obtain monocle
Wow he looks old!  Vote up if I just stated the obvious.
did you start that group?
Be careful.  They will downmod you if it appears you care less about the OS you run than what it enables you to do.
I'm not sure what you're trying to say... I wasn't talking about the Middle Ages at all, seeing as there was no Russia until the 16th Century. What are these "historical docs" that you speak of? Are you actually reading primary source material from the Russian archives? You have me a bit lost...  Also, who/what is Khrushenko? You mean Kruschev?
Can I get that CBS clip?
It ends with the guy just wacking off into her mouth? Fail.
I may be in the minority here but I'm a big believer in making judgment calls.  Some, if not many, people have bad judgment.  However, I would be willing to risk a terrorist attack if the worker drone would just let the child through.   Autonomy is like a muscle.  Use it and it grows stronger.
http://www.reddit.com/r/codeprojects/  We tried with codeprojects.  NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!! we lost.  that is ok.
Worst President ever....  *MISSION ACCOMPLISHED!*
fake as a PalinVP
What?  Of course it matters, it's the whole fucking issue.  If the ants were left alone, more may have survived the night outside the nest.  This article says they were "plucked" and spent the night in a plastic bowl.  So the ants didn't necessarily sacrifice themselves if they weren't destined to *definitely* die...
I hate how after every sentence he sings he includes a YEUAHHH at the end.
Q: What's the difference between Sarah Palin and GWB?  A: Lipstick.
I often view Metallica as the heir to Black Sabbath. It's hard to think of many other bands besides those two with such epic songs and big, dark, catchy riffs. 
It was a glitch, the article's been updated to reflect that.
"And most individuals of any species experience a life made up mostly of "work, toil, and death" anyway."  Unless you are a rich playbody, in which case you live for hedonism and sex. Superorganisms my ass.  My individual cells are not sentient, the collection of certain groups in my brain however, are. I don't think ants are sentient but I think they can feel some form of mild pain from dying or starving. Sucks to be them. Sucks to be alive at all sometimes. No matter what each ant does they basically will work to death and die so a new hive can be made and more can work to death and die, there is no end to it.  At least humans get to retire.
Why haven't we seen any of these actions yet? Hummm?
As a registered Republican, I can honestly tell you - many do NOT.
That's the "balanced" part.  Sometimes they tell "fair" to fuck off.
Did he have any good plays?
There's variability between members of a species. Can't we leave it at that and suggest that a discrepancy between ideal body temperature exists....  "Patients can get thousands of dollars wasted on the work up of their nonexistent fever."   ...I'm no doctor, but really? thousands?
You think every person with a Southern accent is a moron? I'd say you're the real moron if that is really your implication. These guys built their home by hand, are largely sufficient, and are also accomplished musicians. What makes you lot so superior?
Probably not, since it looks like the trades that were made at that price aren't going to stick.  Edit: actually, the article just says they'll be 'undone'.  I guess that could be reasonably interpreted as 'the people who made the screwup will be obligated to fix it.'
Sort-of.  I wouldn't think that he had the down-time to partake....he was too busy winning awards and saving us from ourselves.
Hahaha. I just listened on YouTube and it sounded *exactly* as I expected from your post. And wow, that kick sounds like ass...
Thanks buddy!
If you want to harm babies you should join the Roman Catholic Church.  When you join the RCC you get unsupervised access to the congregation's children (in sunday school) every week, and if your paedophilia gets discovered the RCC will unconditionally defend you and fund your legal battles.  
As an ex-pipex customer, I can't say I've had this happen to me, and being on DLA I keep a very close eye on what goes out of my bank account.
Wrong. This is ignorance born of stupidity, arising from a lack of intelligence. Like President Bush, Gov. Palin doesn't know because she has a smaller brain than a pygmee chimpanzee.
Oh, you know, all of them, any of them. 20-fucking-4-fucking-caret-fucking-gold
D- , See me After Class.
it wasnt even in the top 9 how could it have won?
Wow who would of thought you guys would love this car so much! Sign up for the forum if you guys want to. Feel free to post stuff like this all day long.
Really?  And who, pray tell, am "I"?
&gt;Something about the only huge bank not being completely destroyed being based in San Francisco, away from the greed of New York.  That's a pretty broad blanket statement.  You think that the physical location of their headquarters is a primary factor in their well-being?
Quadruple-links then, for improved balance.
 The elections are almost definitely **rigged**.   Might as well register for fun though.
Frusciante's actually a pretty decent musician in his own right. He's just in an awful band.
I wonder if this'll turnip on the front page.
The book's criticism of terminal emulators had nothing to do with some new-fangled intarweb thingamajig anyway. It describes ancient systems that had vital features which would make any hard-core terminal emulator user of today drool uncontrollably, such as a kernel implementation of what would seem like the functional equivalent of ncurses and screen. Good thing that there has never been a shortage of people wanting to cram UI code into the kernel where it so rightfully belongs. Alas, despite their valiant efforts we're stuck with these "worse is better" systems today!  EDIT: This in addition to the stuff that is solved today by sticking to VT100/ANSI, of course. Most of the chapter concentrates on problems caused by lack of standardization (joys of fixing a broken termcap, dealing with variable capabilities of terminals, and so on). There's also other obsolete stuff, such as complaining about the slow refresh speed of curses programs - this is obviously solved with the ncurses accelerator built into the newest GPUs.
Gun control? Voting to renew the PATRIOT Act? Voting for FISA telecom immunity (an action that arguably doesn't violate the letter of the Constitution but most certainly its spirit)?  I like Obama a lot more than the other guy, but he's made politically expedient compromises that are very much a violation of the ideas and ultimate law created by the American Founding Fathers. Throwing around his law degree or status as a Constitutional scholar doesn't change that.
How come they don't tell us precisely what the "glitch" was?
No, she has empathy, she's just really really gullible and got taken in by the Dumb. (Witch hunters, seriously?!!!)
Un be fucking lievable.  Call them.  Senate: (202) 224-xxxx where [extensions listed here (PDF)](http://www.senate.gov/general/resources/pdf/senators_phone_list.pdf)
vice janitor
Hey, Richard Feynman had auditory hypnogogic (while falling asleep) hallucinations once or twice!
This bitch is retarded 
Everyone should do this. (Can someone loan me a fiver?) ;-)
You, sir, are an idiot and an ass.  "Sub-species?"  FOAD.
FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKE FAKES
Then why, my seemingly insightful friend, have these APIs not all died the firey death you so casually claim will befall?  Linux has had fifteen years, and Unix as a whole even longer than that, to arrive at a working solution.
 Yes they do.  It would be [this man](http://www.davecummings.com/t1/index.php) (nsfw) 
If you disagree with the following, take it up with the authors of this website: http://diabetesinformationhub.com/WhatCausesDiabetes.php Following are the Causes of Diabetes    Hereditary or Inherited Traits : It is strongly believed that due to some genes which passes from one generation to another, a person can inherit diabetes. It depends upon closeness of blood relationship as mother is diabetic, the risk is 2 to 3%, father is diabetic, the risk is more than the previous case and if both the parents are diabetic, the child has much greater risk for diabetes.    Age : Increased age is a factor which gives more possibility than in younger age. This disease may occur at any age, but 80% of cases occur after 50 year, incidences increase with the age factor.    **Poor Diet** (Malnutrition Related Diabetes) : Improper nutrition, low protein and fiber intake, high intake of refined products are the expected reasons for developing diabetes.    **Obesity and Fat Distribution** : Being overweight means increased insulin resistance, that is if body fat is more than 30%, BMI 25+, waist grith 35 inches in women or 40 inches in males.    Sedentary Lifestyle : People with sedentary lifestyle are more prone to diabetes, when compared to those who exercise thrice a week, are at low risk of falling prey to diabetes.    Stress : Either physical injury or emotional disturbance is frequently blamed as the initial cause of the disease. Any disturbance in Cortiosteroid or ACTH therapy may lead to clinical signs of the disease.    Drug Induced: Clozapine (Clozaril), olanzapine (Zyprexa), risperidone (Risperdal), quetiapine (Seroquel) and ziprasidone (Geodon) are known to induce this lethal disease.    Infection : Some of the strephylococci is suppose to be responsible factor for infection in pancreas.    Sex : Diabetes is commonly seen in elderly especially males but, strongly in women and those females with multiple pregnancy or suffering from (PCOS) Polycystic Ovarian Syndrome.    Hypertension : It had been reported in many studies that there is direct relation between high systolic pressure and diabetes.    Serum lipids and lipoproteins : High triglyceride and cholesterol level in the blood is related to high blood sugars, in some cases it has been studied that risk is involved even with low HDL levels in circulating blood. 
What is there to debate about torture? It's torture god dammit! You don't fucking do it!
DANKE!!!
I don't care about winning, I'm just curious if it cracked the top 10.
“The biggest robbery in the history of this country is taking place as you read this. Though no guns are being used, 300 million hostages are being taken. Make no mistake about it: After stealing a half trillion dollars to line the pockets of their war-profiteering backers for the past five years, after lining the pockets of their fellow oilmen to the tune of over a hundred billion dollars in just the last two years, Bush and his cronies -- who must soon vacate the White House -- are looting the U.S. 
i really hope i'm wrong.  8 years of this bullshit has turned me into a horrible pessimist.
I never said I didn't believe in the possibility of other life forms, it's more the whole conspiracy theories surrounding it.
The built-in search bar to the Vista start menu makes finding shortcuts lost in a sea of folders painless. That or use the quick launch toolbar on XP/Vista.
Bad link.
I've come to the conclusion that, for posts like this one, people don't read the pre-amble, they jump straight to the "list"...  In fact, I'm going to give it a name:  Cole's Law  "For any given Best Of list, a maximum of 10% of the preamble will be read, the rest will be skipped due to tl;dr"
Hence "end of a line".
Except for the cheese makers who will be forced under E.U. "geographic indicators" to stop calling Canadian-made cheddar and feta and rochfort cheese cheddar and feta and rochfort and call those cheeses by other names.  They're not happy at all. 
Just another piece of evidence that the whole bailout package is a thinly veiled attempt to push more power into the executive branch.
I am very familiar with freelance art, and I use pirated copies of the entire Adobe Creative Suite. You are right that it is extremely expensive, but Adobe has never targeted the 'low-end market', that's the point.  YOU are not in Adobe's target market, nor am I.  Adobe expects that we can't pay, and the high price is made to compensate for the absence of a low end market.  Companies who purchase licensees in volumes pay high prices for Adobe's stuff because it is THE de-facto in any kind of design.  I think Adobe's price structure makes sense, and I am glad that they expect me to pirate, and I will continue to do so.
You are on the ball with listing its talking points, but...saying they have an 11% ratio, and taking a nearly 2 billion dollar loss earlier this year, are a juxtaposition that would make any investor look sideways at the banks fundamentals, supporting that is the fact :  &gt;The bank also increased its 2008 forecast for uncollectible debt to as high as $2.9 billion
check the blog
But he's perfectly right!  The internet *does* give complainers more of a voice than people who are quietly satisfied.  Internet commenters are self-selected.
Could someone please elaborate to me what exactly is wrong with ALSA?  Is this from a purely developmental point of view?  I've never had any trouble with doing anything under it, and every major release component has compiled cleanly and easily for as long as I can remember, so I'm a bit confused.  Of course, I've been using one of the most known and solidly supported sound cards in existence (SB Live! w/ EMU10K1) for the past seven or eight years on different distributions, and I'm not too interested past local 2.0/2.1 functionality, so I can't speak for others.
Hmm. I'm not sure but based on electoral votes and congressional representatives I would guess Nebraska, Idaho, Wyoming or Alaska. They voted Republican in the last four election and and have only Republican reps in the House and Senate.  McCain may have a 30-some point lead in Utah, but one of their three representatives is still a Democrat. 
Bunk Beds! *More than meets the eye!*
LOL, obviously, given the last two elections.
I have ALWAYS wished that the election was between Ron Paul and Deniis Kucinich.  Unfortunately the corporate media managed to stifle them, marginalize them and we are stuck with two company men instead;  one a (probably) terminally ill old whore of a man who can't remember what he ate for breakfast and whose rube running mate is simply a national embarrassment;  the other a man who looks, sounds and behaves presidentially but who obviously is a puppet for big finance and big telecoms.
Right, but in this case he says he has a crush on Palin. He painted his daughter because she does a good impersination of Palin (I assume she looks like Palin?)
No link yet (cannot link cnn homepage it's a "dupe" from forever ago) but hit [CNN](http://cnn.com) and check the big red breaking box. 
Apparently you have no problem with non-vegans thinking you're an obnoxious idiot.  That's fine by me; it just means that many more people who'll ignore you.  My steaks, burgers, milk and cheese are safe.
Whaaa, whaaa, whaaaa... Your shit's all retarded, and you talk like a fag.
Smartest comment I've ever read on reddit. Honestly, what are you doing here? I'd imagine you're pretty bored with the level of discourse.
Learn how to do it right. zombiehunters.org
That's always what I think when I see large-scale art. how many hours did that take?  How do people paint like that and not be seen?
Dontcha just love the two-party system?
Holy shit, drefus is hot as hell!!! I would pound her vagina non-stop
It's this useless attitude that makes it so hard for third parties to come up with the measly 5% to get matching funds.
But, but... how do they know to cover the hole?  They've obviously not been *taught* this behavior.  How awesome.
Sadly just a typo. I'm getting sloppy.   But yeah, I agree that the political upside for Palin must have appeared huge. 
A car-wreck in her pants.  I guess I've narrowly missed a car-wreck, because I have seen skid marks in my drawers.
Un be fucking lievable.  They are going to attach the Paulson Plan to a bill that the House has already passed (meaning if the House wants to re-reject the plan, they'll have to vote down a previous bill they already agreed on)!  Call them.  A legislation of this magnitude needs careful consideration and deliberation, regardless of the doomsday fear tactics we're getting from Paulson. Senate [contact list](http://www.senate.gov/general/contact_information/senators_cfm.cfm)   or  (202) 224-xxxx where [extensions listed here (PDF)](http://www.senate.gov/general/resources/pdf/senators_phone_list.pdf)
Thanks, just found them there.
But now everybody's doing it! It's far better to be too cool to hate Metallica.
I don't even think that website belongs to Paul.
How does comment voting in any way influence story promotion?
What was your Major Exactly? I'm guessing your undergrade wasn't a business major. They don't teach the fundamentals of Finance and the stock market in a MBA class. They expect for you to usually already know it. However it seem you havent.  
The best way I can conceivably put it is like this:  Often, you can teach someone how to program, but you can't teach them how to design.  I'm not saying this to be mean or discouraging, but teaching rules and syntax is often much easier than learning the intricacies of design. Good luck, regardless.  Oh, and generally speaking, programming pays better. Just saying... but seriously, no one's going to fault you for being a jack of all trades.
I'm pretty sure the deadline is Monday here in Virginia.
At :35 seconds, Katie Couric is like "Your getting this right?"
Get a Rope!!!
There have been studies, here's a recent one: http://www.plosone.org/article/info%3Adoi%2F10.1371%2Fjournal.pone.0003140  And here's some more: http://www.chop.edu/consumer/jsp/division/generic.jsp?id=84662
I guess I look at it on a different wavelength.   I have a few (one primarily) SaaS products. I import my users data the same way they'd have to in any other system since ALL of them are proprietary. If they wanted to export the data from my system, they get to do the same thing.   The difference between my product being web based and my competitors is they never have to mess with upgrades or anything related to the operation of the software on the server side. Any improvements go to all my paying customers (subscription but significantly less than any competitor).
It depends on your definition of "Modern World".  There is no voter registration in North Dakota, and being part of the USA, I would consider it to be "Modern World".
I can't help but point out that in his case, it was obviously meant to defame Obama's character.  It was even pointed out in the comments after the debate, and I believe pointed out during the debate by Obama.  Obama clearly stated exactly what McCain claimed "Obama *didn't get*."  I think that it would be more effective on someone who happens to be dumb as a fucking rock.
Let's get smashed!
Politicians give non-answers in debates? Sound the alarms!
As a Canadian and European I'd like to say that I enjoy my local stuff and would be happy to trade it for some other of my stuff and also wish me best of luck in this project.
I'm no Palin fan, but all this says is she doesn't want to name any specific pubs she reads because she doesn't want to be seen endorsing one pub over another.  It's very common in politics and even the corporate world.  This type of nonsense just makes the left look petty.  There are more productive ways to win this fight.  EDIT: For example...  http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/74gy9/gov_palin_youre_toast_troopergate_witness_flips/
Call their offices and let them know that.  Obama: (202) 224-2854  McCain: (202) 224-2235
I think it's the other way around actually.  I think they mentioned on the 'bullshit' episode he was in that the bud he gets is really good quality.
If practice makes perfect, but no one is perfect... why practice?
If you're going to post that in every thread, can you please take out the bold formatting?
 los angeles craigslist &gt; SF valley &gt; adult gigs    NEED SARAH PALIN LOOKALIKE ASAP FOR ADULT FILM (LA)    Reply to: gigs-836109998@craigslist.org [?]  Date: 2008-09-10, 8:20PM PDT      Looking for a Sarah Palin lookalike for an adult film to be shot in next 10 days.     Major adult studio.     Please send pix, stats etc. ASAP     Pay: $2000-3000     No anal required      Location: LA  it's NOT ok to contact this poster with services or other commercial interests  Compensation: $2000-3000  PostingID: 836109998
A few days ago I wrote elsewhere that the McPalin Show was Disney meets Dallas meets Twin Peaks.  It's got it all: lies, money, sex, big hair, lipstick and weird backwards talking.
I'll see it if it contains the line, **"I'm the God of WAR, bitch!**
Wow that was totally the AntiReddit... I forget how many of them there are out there.  Funny thing is you can bet ALMOST ALL of them clicked through to the gay porn! EDIT: I just looked at all the pix - the cameraman totally concentrated on the oldest, least shapely participants.  I know damn well there were plenty hotties there, but surely showing them would have made the whole thing look, well, more appealing and attractive.  Media bias! Media bias!
To be honest, I think it's mostly just a response to the Band's attitude for the last 10 years (at least). Metallica could produce an album that was better than Master of Puppets, and people would still find something to complain about, because the ego that radiates out of Lars' drum kit drowns out any metal awesomeness that otherwise may be coming out of it.  It doesn't help that they do and say things that completely alienate even their most die-hard fans all for the sake of making themselves look as pretentious and ass-cocky as possible. They don't even seem to realize anymore that they don't spend all that time writing music for *themselves* the only reason they've ever played music is for their *fans*.  The same thing generally happens to any band that becomes as big as Metallica. Take 20 years of people non-stop telling you how awesome you are, and eventually you actually begin to think that you *can't* do anything wrong or that everything you do is somehow leagues better than every person on earth.  Compare them to a band like Blind Guardian or Iced Earth. Those guys are insanely talented and have earned a respectable following world-wide, but never really broke through the stratosphere that Metallica basically defined. So instead of the ego-maniac do-no-wrong geniuses, you get musicians who genuinely love playing music, genuinely love their fans, and it shows in their live performances and in their album creations. Blind Guardian in particular loves fan feedback and always makes a note of it when talking about their albums.  I don't really blame Hetfield and the gang for what they've become. How do you get that big and still keep perspective?
which religion would you volunteer to inflitrate as an undercover agent?
&gt;We're not stupid, we're merely shallow. So, for instance, while I support Obama, I will readily switch sides if Palin removes her blouse during the debate.  That's ridiculous, nobody's going to vote for her if she removes her blouse.  We'll vote for her if she *starts* to remove her blouse and says she won't take it off until we vote for McCain.
That is so sad. I once talked with a guy who could not live in San Francisco with his lover from Europe, who has HIV. He cannot even visit.
Alaska is a foreign country?
sign me up
Nail in the coffin!!
Please vote, this is going to be close
Only one of two will be elected.  Note that voting for a third party candidate will not fix deficiencies in our voting system any more than listening to the radio improves TV programming.  Work on encouraging adoption of better voting systems such as [range voting](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Range_voting). In the meantime, vote for whichever of the two candidates who may win who is closest to what you want.
From what I gather...it's the same bill! They're just adding a tax cut package. See whiteskwirl2's link above.  &gt;Senate leaders have scheduled a vote for Wednesday on the $700 billion Wall Street rescue plan rejected by the House.  &gt;Majority Leader Harry Reid and GOP Leader Mitch McConnell say, however, that they're going to add a tax cut package already rejected by the House on Monday.
"What magazines do you read?" "All of them"   WTF???
Thanks for posting this.
The ideologies aren't radical. Unless of course, you maintain the entirety of the western world outside of the US is radical. 
the better vote against this piece of crap or there will be riots in the fucking street...oh wait...they have already planned for this...  http://www.armytimes.com/news/2008/09/army_homeland_090708w/  lockdown to follow
`6430137921369737815669972393355670341665388963383`   `4268442764531696452037991414896954815899307990433`   `4970542677140281714437289052360816344124921139148`   `3981752959354115343790985116041173568693864454698`   `5692973942548536749947731409131807400480345357191`   `0620640511532122828876589618430508826498822633357`   `2455259456970492122102776871547185272705907380471`   
So much for her majoring in journalism.
Not serious.  About what you would expect from an aging rock star.
Well the crowd and judges seemed to like it
I can't imagine her being interested enough in anything happening outside of Alaska to pick up a newspaper or magazine. She's a fucking joke, and scary as hell.
37 months? This man blatantly and grandly abused the trust he was given when he was put in a highly secretive, stupidly powerful position, and now he's getting less time than some people get for weed? Only another pathetic reminder of how hopelessly broken the whole system really is.
what do you use the pound?  Great Britain and the European Union are one and the same when it comes to mindset towards america, their citizens have bankers and governments that have both meddled in our affairs and have been liberated from either Hitler or the threat of Hitler.  Any comments from the E.U. will get a large middle finger back, and they should shut their traps.
Bring me my ranch dressing hose!
and the moderator says: "no words where?  what are you talking about"  biden looks into the lens: "that's right.  i'm NOT using a teleprompter" and looks towards palin's podium  no matter what she says he still wins.  bonus points if she desperately asks a camera to "shoot over there to show there aren't any teleprompters"
Perhaps, but...  The reason I'm subscribed to several subreddits is because I like a balance of various topics on my front page (and pages 2-4 which I often browse through). When a subreddit like WATMM is flooded to the point where it dominates all of the other subreddits you're subscribed to - even some of the high traffic ones were being pushed back 3-4 pages - it turns all of my reddit experience into 'yet another music makers forum'. If I wanted a music makers forum I'd go somewhere else, plus on top of that, about 99% of the links being posted had zero discussion behind them, so I have no idea how the links were getting pushed so high over things like /r/programming, /r/pics, /r/funny, etc.  Anyway, as I said, it was obnoxious enough that I unsubbed, and probably won't re-sub, I'll just stick to KVR, HC, and other places for that kind of news - at least it's on my terms, not stuffed in my face.
OR just use the proper HDR feature in photoshop...
NYC is trying to go green.  This and hybrid taxis are a good way.  And give the buses the ability to change red lights to green.  That's more of an incentive for people to use buses rather than cars.
I'm trying to learn Haskell myself and, while the language surely seems *really interesting*, I still haven't gotten really used to it. I try to write some programs with it to learn a bit more, but for "real" projects I always end up resorting to either Python or C++. I've also heard a lot of good things about Erlang, but I figured I should stick with Haskell until I understand it better.  Maybe one of the reasons I like C++ so much is familiarity.
Wow, it's 2008 are groups really not using wiki's for internal docs?  this is one of the better documentation focused ones http://www.dokuwiki.org/  this one requires no server/install http://www.tiddlywiki.com/
Yeah I read most of that, sooo basically they wan to give them money and cut the taxes they have to pay... great!
Honestly, it would have been enough to bring this man up on one charge: treason. That is eligible for the death penalty.
Is that better or worse than answering with "reddit"?
Yes. This will make my Star Trek Living Room complete!
It's called Ruby on Rails.
http://www.senate.gov/general/contact_information/senators_cfm.cfm  Just in case you wish to contact your senator.
they did until bushie cut their tax liability to ZERO eight years ago.  Nice try detractor.
&gt;This is the real problem. That's $600Bn not doing anything. "The spice must flow!"  I don't agree.  If everyone was leveraged up to their eyeballs, the economy would collapse the moment anything happened.
To be fair, the article did not address that question at all.  It was more a review of gOS 3, which seems to be an alright distro...
I'm sick of you fucking cocksuckers' political shit - that's why I opted out of political subreddits.  But a few bitches like you are just too fucking stupid to read while they are submitting.  FUCK YOU.
Watching the video would have taught you that it is shipped to a pharmacy like any other drug.
Oh wow. I had no idea it was that bad.  While you get less working a restaurant, working a bar in Australia get you around AU$25p.h. (~US$20).
As stated "something that will keep you out of harms way". I don't know about the jobs available to be chosen in the military however I am sure that there are jobs that are mostly paperwork just as there are ones that are only combat.  The coast guard sounds like the best bet. I don't agree with the war(s) going on so I wouldn't want to actually see combat. However a paycheck and my education paid for is appealing.
I've never understood the argument that you can influence a binary election with fake polls.  Why would candidate X being ahead make you more likely to vote for him?
I agree.  Any taste other than mine is shitty.
Wow death threats. If they instead were Muslims saying such things about the "desecration" of Muslim symbols, they would instead be "crazed islamo fascists."  I've always felt that being offended means there's some egoic self to defend thus I believe it's best not to be offended. But the outrage over Muslim's outrage never quite made sense to me -- try showing a cartoon of a Jew chasing down a coin in the street, or of course hammering a few nails in a picture of Jesus. Too many people get offended over this bogus stuff.
Voice mail boxes are full! If need be, use this form to let them know how you feel. It's simple and provides a pre-written statement that you can edit.  http://votenobailout.org/ 
Are you an idiot?  It fell 700, rose 200... The stock market ALWAYS rises a fraction of the amount it dropped... Doesnt mean a thing.
Go ahead and blame Democrats for the economic crisis.  While you're at it, completely gloss over the fact that the GOP has held the White House for 20 of the last 32 years; that the GOP also held Congress for 6 years under Clinton and managed to get him impeached for lying about sex; and held Congress for another six years under Bush, when we saw the largest deficits AND the largest increase in the national debt in history.   Now that's some great leadership.  Go GOP!  /sarcasm
My understanding is it's not per account, the limit is per person per bank... that is, all your checking, your savings, your investment accounts, all of it (that is held in one specific bank) has to add up to less than 100K in order to be fully protected under FDIC as it currently stands. Even if you're not "rich" but you've been diligently saving up for decades to finally buy your own house, this could affect you. Also, if you're frugal enough to have amassed a decent sum, the interest rates generally get better the more you have in one account, which is another incentive for not breaking the amount up into smaller sums across several banks.
Also good for making *really* sheer lingerie that additionally happens to be waterproof, indestructible, drip-dry and non-stain. ;-P
&gt;It doesn't help that the CD release does sound like garbage, though. I hear a lot of people complain about this, but personally I couldn't judge something as subtle as an album mix unless I hear two versions back to back. I doubt most of the people complaining about it could, either. In fact, I doubt most of the people complaining about it on this thread have listened to anything from the album. 
Her body does - in that it has breasts, and is of a moderately related build. Other than that, there's no suggestion she looks like her facially.  Either way, it doesn't imply in any way that he has a crush on his daughter, and it'd be foolish to assume that.
I see your problem with the term "encryption" but it does not necessarily imply that the there needs to be a decryption, nor does it necessary mean there is a key (although the standard idea of a cryptosystem involves a key).  But, by definition, SHA is a hashing algorithm used for encryption.  I agree that 'encryption' usually implies that there is a retrieval algorithm, but there can be one-directional encryption, where this isn't true. And you are right, its not technically a encryption "function" because it is impossible to avoid collision for every string possible.  'Encryption' may be a bit misleading, but its not incorrect.  SHA is defined as a Cryptographic Hash Function by NIST.
Does anyone use Windows 98?
I don't. I'm Scottish, and have lived in Finland and Denmark. Anywhere in Western Europe, Dennis Kucinich would be center or, at the most, center-left. But *inside America* his policies *are* radical. And that is the reality you have to confront and change if you agree with his policies.
Hmmm...that sounds a little less intriguing than yellowbkpk's bridge to somewhere practical...
Wut about pancakes?
Modding you up for rhyming. 
"Alaska is like a microcosm of America!"  So that makes you the George W. Bush analog in that analogy, right?
Sadly, I think this is the only way this guy will face any responsibility for his actions under the current system.
will somebody please embroil this hack in some kind of career-ending scandal?
This was 2/3 of the Republicans in the House voting against something that all their leaders told them to vote for. How often does that happen? That's why its overwhelming, especially when you consider how easily most Democrats fell into line.  Kucinich? Nobody listens to Kucinich except his fan club on reddit. He barely got renominated this year.  This is just sour grapes on the part of you and the rest of reddit.
Giant Douche or Turd Sandwich? Neither, thanks.
This is the exact reason why I doubt my faith in Christianity. These preachers are preaching intolerance towards gays, they're backing a party that has obviously destroyed the middle class, and they hide behind god to spread ignorance and fear which has been the pinnacle of the Bush Administration these past 8 years.
There doesn't seem to be anything here. Yeah, I reddit.
One teeny piece of the puzzle is that they must put as much distance between themselves and Bush as they possibly can.  The Rethugs are the greatest grandstanders out there.  I have a rethug representative and this is the first time he has ever voted with my wishes.  Before that, he always responded with the most nauseating GOP party line.  Blech to him!
don't feel bad for her. She accepted the position WITHOUT hesitation.  She has demonstrated repeatedly that she is an ignorant rube who can't string a coherent thought together, much less articulate one.  She is widely known for abusing her power, cronyism and now has compounded these travesties with obstruction of justice.   Fuck her.  The Princess of Mooseturd is a loser and should be dumped yesterday.
I didn't say obesity problem. I said "All of the health problems American's have."  That includes cancer, disease, etc...
her old mans business partner allegedly did
Updated w/ link to story here:  http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/74i48/senate_to_vote_on_financial_rescue_plan_wednesday/
Seconded. I still can't watch that seen without choking up.
&gt;... collective interests of our historic allies...  Wow. I smell Conrad Black. He was big on "the Anglosphere" and forging ties with "our historic allies".  
I didn't have to, but a friend and I wrote a C compiler during our first year. For some reason we were in a Visual Basic class, but we had completed the entire term's assignments during the first two weeks so we had a lot of free lab time.  We actually wrote two compilers. The first time around we just winged it without having any knowledge about compilers and that didn't work out very well, so we borrowed the green dragon book from another professor and with its help we wrote a decent compiler.  I agree that it is lots of fun and a great learning experience. After writing the compiler we had a lot of confidence in our skills and so we grabbed the current-at-the-time Red Hat Linux release (4.something IIRC) and started hacking the kernel a bit. We might have ended up decent Linux hackers if soon after we didn't find Quake C and spend most of the rest of our university careers writing and playing odd Quake mods.  Wow, that got off topic :)
I love that they actually took that position in court.  Why isn't CNN hammering them with their own language every day?
That clip's not even the worst part of this whole "interview"...
He wasn’t referring to their *intended* votes, but to their final votes as recorded by Diebold.
You mean like how it specifically says:  &gt; From our sister site [Derober](http://www.derober.com/): Actor Christopher Plummer once said of Hollywood...  at the beginning of the article? ;-p
"every normal man must be tempted, at times, to spit on his hands, hoist the black flag and begin slitting throats." -- H.L. Mencken
I love how her voice hits that higher register when she gets nervous...      SOURCES! I have a vast variety of 
He didn't blame it.  He just said it wasn't a reliable source of information for finding out fan preferences.
...Well played. 
I'm a French Canadian living in Quebec and *I can*.  That's way beyond pathetic, I'm not sure there is a word for it yet..  Palinetic ?
So giving the money to the bankers is a better idea then?
lol, no I just don't respond to ad hominems. It's not worth it.
I think this belongs in BlackMenGoneWild
and McCain won't survive a term in office. 
And McCain took credit for it passing before it failed. Then once it failed McCain blamed Obama and the rest of the Repbulicans blamed the Democrats. Haven't they heard the one about counting your chickens before their hatched?
"Good, Bad ... I'm the guy with the gun."
I guess that would probably also stop the extremely pushy and in some cases nasty Primus telemarketing calls I get nigh-constantly.  Tempting, but I'm gonna stick with my original answer and say "Fuck Primus with a rusty hatchet".
She obviously can't read. Good job of hiding it!!!
i bet i could debate Governor Palin over 100 times...  but each time she takes an article of clothing or christian ethic off...
I don't remember what it's called, but it's some sort of oil that simulates the "moistness" of fresh foods. It doesn't evaporate so they stay moist for damn near forever.   Check out the beginning of the Good Eats episode where Alton makes granola bars. There's a pretty good explanation of it.  Edit: I guess I could be a nice guy and link to it. It's called "Power Trip"  http://www.surfthechannel.com/info/television/Good_Eats/68595/S9E5.html?aid=73230  Edit2: Palm Kernel Oil. It's actually at the beginning of part 2 if that's all you're interested in.
As a teacher, you go through the rigors of apprenticeship.  This post explores how maybe that isn't so bad.
Right. So the mob is just not doing their homework?  I think this should be approached with great care to the emotions of the crowd. There is a great chance to win hearts and minds for science here. If only the people who know better were able refrain from being asses themselves and not contest the situation. The ignorant asses are just ignorant. The ones who know better should not try to convince the public of their preconceived ideas about science and scientists.
Fax machines never sleep - let's make sure they have an overflowing pile of HELL NO faxes tomorrow morning.
Sound has been workink out of the box on all distributions for quite a few years now...
I think a viable strategy to change the discourse in American politics is to demonstrate that there is a major block of voters dedicated enough to progressivism that they are willing to sit out of the two major parties to pursue it. In doing so, it will force the major parties who value large voting blocks to shift themselves to encompass this group. This is what happens with abolition of slavery, womens' right to vote, and workers rights. All required "radical" third parties that got big enough to get major party attention and eventually an adoption of thier positions.
Planned or off the top of her dumb head? Either way, tacky, and GREAT to watch.   I love Palin, I love to feel uncomfortable while watching her talk. LOVE IT. 
And not a single one of them ever mentioned a supreme court case other than Roe v. Wade.
i just sit closer to the screen.
&gt;Easily made using one bath and two hand towels, 'Cassie the Cat' will make the purrrfect impression on your guests!  If my life ever gets so empty that i get pleasure out of manipulating towels into shapes vaguely resembling cats, i will end it. 
Hm.  Generally, it's better to set the defaults to something most of your users will like than something you like.  Obviously this doesn't apply if you don't care what your users think or hate them.
???
oh she will, it will go viral. if it makes it onto the daily show or the colbert report, shes gotta see it then
"I am unaware that you exist" becomes quite paradoxical when the nature of a linked-list is taken into account. The antecedent for the personal pronoun "you" is, of course, the anterior "him" box. The her-instance's `value` string requires a prior knowledge of the him-instance's existence. However, this is a technical impossibility as the her-instance contains no reference (in fact, a reference to Nothing itself) to the him-instance. It is at this cross-road between technical and intended pictorial meaning that I will form a broader reading of the cartoon.  From a logical mindset, this paradox is seemingly resolved by taking a standpoint that the her-instance's `value` is simply a string of bytes without intended meaning. While technically valid, such interpretations completely ignore the extra-technical information, namely the surrounding box, pointing-arrow, instance names, and title. The cartoon-as-a-whole is not a mere "programmatical observation" as the author purports.  Semiotically, the cartoon can be divided into two realms: the technical and the pictorial. The technical exists solely in the code itself while the pictorial in the visual elements surrounding the code. By agency of the arrow, "you"'s antecedent is drawn outside of the technical realm and into the pictorial - as I asserted earlier, the antecedent is the "him"-*box*.Thus, this arrow also gives the her-instance's string meaning in the pictorial realm. The string becomes a pictorial confirmation of the technical limits  of the her-instance's realm of awareness.  The cartoon's tragedy flows in two parts. The first, and in my opinion the most heavily intended, is one of the him-instance's unrequited love. The second is of the her-instance's ignorance of her lover. Indeed, the her-instance is aware of nothing outside of itself and stands as an icon of quintessential loneliness. The disconnect is permanent. No recourse-function exists to unite the lovers and change their initialized values.
Christ, don't say that ('fort knox is being looted'), especially don't say it in reference to the bail-out, you'll have bush confused over whether he should value his war or his bail-out more.
That reminds me of that popular song from back in the day, called "Crab and jellyfish DNA just won't splice" Ah, good times.
I don't think you people really get it-- Troopergate DOESN'T matter.  It will have NO impact on the elections.  In 2004 America "reelected" a president who had abused alcohol, drugs, conducted an illegal war, outed a CIA agent, and pretty much shredded the constitution. Some little "troopergate" nonsense is not going to move the needle on public opinion.
We hear every day about how carbon nanotubes are going to revolutionize pretty much every product in existence, and make a whole bunch of new ones possible. But it's always been followed with the caveat "When someone comes up with a cost-effective way to manufacture them."  This is the first time I've heard anything about someone actually doing that. Sounds like it could be huge.
To continue what AdRook Said: Furthermore they've seen tremendous growth in the past 1-2 years when they got rid of their last CEO, are a multinational company (less effects from a depression in the US), and their food is cheap so, during a depression, more people buy their product.   Traders are obviously not so happy with the US right now! 
So - condition plaid?
WHY AM I NOT GOING UNDERWATER? DEAR GOD, WHY AM I NOT GOING UNDERWATER?!
In general this is the answer to the question, "Why should humans not live in hot, humid places frequently struck by natural disaster."  "FUCKING MOLD!"
Ok, I reread chapter 6 so I'm with you. I'm still confused about one point: UI code belongs in the kernel? (please be sarcasm)
Not now! It's **economy** week on reddit!
Take a prozac.  
They've remained the US Dollar to the US Peso, thats probably the source of the confusion.
He would probably enjoy it ... its only a matter of time before Hannity comes out of some closet or another.
I agree 100%. It's about time that we stop helping greedy companies or those trying to screw the system and help those who have a major set back by an illness or medical condition.
He's such a class act, isn't he?
I think that if ants had a level of conscious understanding that they would be awfully offended by your claim that they lack conscious understanding.
A stylized "G". *Wonderful*. -_-
Yeah, the brain is a crazy thing. I'm not surprised that after consciously putting yourself in that state you started hearing things.  Late at night usually when I'm reading or something I quite often hear my friends or family members' voices, not in my head but as if they're there in the room. Not saying anything important or even talking directly to me, but still, it freaked me out a little at first. Now I just roll with it. Maybe I should...maybe I should get that checked out...
But he is a...
Not to rethugs
You've got to be fucking kidding me.  This is beyond sad.
Not to mention they both want war with no end in sight.  Obama's just more clever about how he words it
Try again.
It doesn't show the first game where the Government beat the Tax Payers :(
It doesn't, but I suppose it can be seen as a manifestation of the same controlling attitude.  
I am a Metallica fan, even though I don't regularly listen to any of the music they made since 1991.  Judge talent by its high points and character by its low points.
That's why he wears two pairs.
This guy is right on. I have seen this phenomenon. I believe it is why they chose her.  The skill set to lead is different than the skillset of the showman.   The skills overlap, but a leader only uses showmanship to garner support for his position.   All the showman has is his audience, so getting the audience on his side is paramount.  It's like when a scientist and a "psychic" appear together on a show.   The scientist is supposed to be there to try to catch the pychic who they know is actually performing mentalist illusions.  But the scientist is used to using science to discover what is actually happening through honest examination and testing.  The magician has learned to manipulate scientific methods, using the outward appearance of science to obfuscate and confuse, by concealing the truth, instead of revealing the truth.  The psychic/mentalist/magician has performed on stage many times and understands which nonverbal cues to project to distract attention where he wants it focused.   The scientist as clever as he is, has not studied magic and gets drawn right in as a member of the audience. 
Oh, she could also give a bs answer.  I read Time, Newsweek, I also read conservative magazines like National Review, and liberal ones like Vanity Fair to keep informed of different perspectives.
Problem is, scammers would have the means and lack of scruples to take you to court and sue you for a fortune if you tried ripping them off.
What is the percentage of all earnings do they make you motherfucker.  Answer that or you are fucking ass sauce.  I mean it.  I will open a post in 10 minutes with your name if you do not answer dickhead.
lol, thats funny! there are many companies making a killing in Africa...where many "failed" governments exist. When the government no longer works, the most powerful corporation will become the government in one way or another.
I honestly think 50-60% of Fox's audience is staunchly liberal, and watch it "just to see what they're going to do next," in the vernacular of "Private Parts."
...with an error margin of say, 8 hands.
Nah it didn't crack the top 10.  But SwampSparrowSucks got a nod.
chess from scratch.  it's a challenging undertaking.
Thanks for the links. But dismissing a statement because of who makes it is simply the inverse of argument from authority.  Are you aware of anything actually refuting the claims in the documentary? I was thinking somebody has probably done so already unless the claims are individually sound. 
Umm, actually, now that I read it, I think that they were plucked the next morning to see which were alive and which were dead.
"I do not think much of a man who is not wiser today than he was yesterday."  -Abraham Lincoln
i accidentally my whole paycheck?
*Guitar solo*
Fuck George Will.
Exactly, it's just a buzz word.  Like "Al Qaeda" or "change".
You must have trouble making friends.
Ye... It just Means that If a Person Decided To buy 10 MILLION dollars in 10-year Treasury Bonds they may have to pay $2000 dollars more on insurance then they would if they bought 10 Million of shorter term McDonald Bonds. That does not mean McDonalds is more credit worthy then the U.S. Not to mention this &gt;more credit-worthy than the U.S. when measured by prices of CDS-derivatives (credit default swaps Too Bad This is not what evaluates Credit Ratings. Also &gt;CDS-derivative prices are an indicator of investors’ views and mood Again they dont set the credit ratings. 
IT Fail.
Why?   Ok, say tomorrow the government comes in and says you have fallen behind on your mortgage and good ol Uncle Sam comes in and says I will make the bank whole and now I own your house. Here is this for a deal, I will let you live in it and you will pay me rent.  The rent will have to be cheaper then the mortgage on the house otherwise it is infeasible. So the government will have to negotiate a deal with you on how much you can afford. Multiply this by all of the other homeowners in this program and it is a recipe for a bureaucratic nightmare. Plus a whole new office or some type of institution would need to be created and quickly. There would be debating and red tape etc…the government by its nature is not efficient. The relief would come but when? Would the world’s economic system already be in total collapse? Now who will be responsible for the Property Taxes and Insurance on the home? The typical renter/landlord arrangement is that the landlord covers property insurance and the municipal/property taxes. In this new arrangement say the government can get this rolled into the cost of renting the home which is probable. That need is met. By in large though I suspect that the government will want to negotiate rates with municipalities this would have an adverse effect on schools, policing, trash collection etc… For the home insurance they can be like McCain and give you a tax credit for your home insurance. The property would have to be insured though. Maybe the government could create an insurance institution for this program?  More red tape? If not then what insurer would jump at the opportunity to insure this troubled properties? These insurers already can see that these people are not the most responsible The very fact that they are in this program if not then by their credit score proves their lack of responsibility. Insurers would be obligated to charge them more.  Also the renter would have to maintain the property but they have no real incentive to do this. Previously the home owner did have good reason to replace the siding, update a kitchen, pave the driveway, get the idea? Not only does this create jobs and manufacturing but to provide the home owner gains in property value by doing this. Remove the incentive and you are leaving yourself open for stagnation. While it was mentioned previously you could do a rent to own type deal. Where you pay the government you would in essence be paying a mortgage. Am I right? Then why not just renegotiate the mortgages? The market, as flawed as it may appear now, is much more efficient in taking care of this mess. Now what to do in situations where the home owner cannot afford to live in the home. You can put the home up on the market in essence foreclose on it and salvage any potential equity that you can. If not then you will let someone live in a house for less and take the loss, this sounds a lot like socialism or communism to me.  This brings me to my final point and the crux of this whole argument. To do this would be subsidizing poor choices made by the home owner and the bank. The people that were responsible and made sound decisions with their money are to foot the bill for people that have not. That makes me furious! Beyond pissed! This works both ways, I am not an advocate of the bailout but something needs to be done. It needs to be done quickly so that stability can come to the market and the focus can come back to investigation and regulation. This can never happen again we need to have an investigation in to what caused this and what can be done to keep it from ever happening again.  I hoped this answered your question. If not let me know. It’s been a long day. 
Is Parent Hood related to Robin Hood?
Perhaps... but if it fixes the diabeetus...
He was talking about electoral votes.
No kidding, ty.
You actually *hear* them? Like, you'd mistake a song stuck in your head for a song playing on the radio?
I'm sure they tried to plug up the tubes with socks, but the e-mails just kept coming!
Remember Afghanistan?
fuck you, this is not a title to fuck around with.
Man, whenever I see "Led" in a headline I instantly think "Zeppelin". I'm dangerously obsessed.
Al Davis - "I've run through a string of coaches I've hand picked myself. Why do they all turn out to be such losers? What is the one constant in the Raiders unaltered string of suck the last ten years? Think, Al! Think!"
No exit would be better IMO.
wait, Bill is that you?
Wait, how can this possibly be?  Spending bills must originate in the House, don't they?  Ah, unless the Senate attaches this to a bill the House has already passed - which seems to be the plan.  Voicemail boxes are filling up, some full already.  Hit them with fax, hit them with email. 
"Why don't you sail that fine phat ass over here?"
That's when she reads them.
Funny thing about open source...  ...it turns out that my time is worth something.
And he was more recently in LOST. 
Fanboy much?  Don't love things that can't love you back...  Edit: Just to clarify, I finished Mass Effect and GTA IV months ago.  What now?  And no, I'm not paying for or playing through shovelware just because its technically an RPG or a platformer or whatever ... I want to play solid A+ games.
can this be a grisham subplot on the next csi?  you could pretty much take this word for word, put it in a trial setting and voila, television!
Oh the wisdom flying around.
You lost me at "Instead of reformulating,...".  Can you put that into pot terms?
Where are you pulling this from? There was no indication in anything she said that that's what she was doing. I mean, shit, I could come up with half a dozen reasons just as plausible as yours:  Maybe she was hiding her reading list because it consists of publications specializing in promoting Creationism?  Maybe she was hiding the fact that she doesn't read *anything*?  Maybe she just sucks at thinking on her feet, reads publications, but couldn't think of anything on the spot?  Maybe she wanted to sound "smart" by giving a bunch of talking points rather than the 5-second answer required by this question?  None of these is any less plausible than your theory, despite your baseless confidence.
I love the way CBS is releasing these short clips every day to build up to the VP debate. Its like a never ending bowl of candy.
This thread is about to come full circle.
Never read it before but I'm positive I've heard it.  Was it in that ridiculous 90's movie, Hackers?  edit: yup it was. brb gonna go HACK THE GIBSON
I can pay cash.  Just show me where to get it.
Odd then... It only plays 29 seconds of it for me.
Make a game, just do some simple 2D sprite game if you aren't experienced at it, or a web based game. They can be very fun to make and you can keep working on it to make it last as long as you want.  In fact I would just reccomend a 2D game anyway, much quicker to get results and for a one person project they generally look a lot nicer.
oh boy, i LOVE candy!
Thanks.  And I was being serious btw, this problem is too important to joke about.
Count to 10 before posting when you are pissed off. You come off as a know nothing jerkoff when you post crap like that.
World's most worthless websites:  * 1) Docstoc
schuyfi, are you posting from an Exxon tanker?  from AIG? are you standing on Wall St. with your head in your hands? I don't agree with g0taclue, but it is funny, and it's poetic justice that lies be spread about Bush, you know, the one who said to a bunch of WDC fatcats, "You're my constituency!"  By the way, do you think any of us here in the Midwest are losing sleep over the bullshit in Wall Street? Not hardly. Not at all.
This business of accusing bands of "selling out" is ridiculous.  If you like something, listen to it.  If you don't like it, don't.  The intentions of the people who made it have nothing to do with it.
I for one prefer my TVs to actually exist.
Kucinich would totally buy you a pony!
"To you. You are arguably not in Palin's target audience. You are computer literate, probably analytical in nature, and you're on reddit."  Absolutely.  "You are computer literate" The elite 25% of American society (I am being VERY generous here).  "probably analytical in nature" The elite 5% of American society (I am being VERY generous here).  "and you're on reddit" 0.0000000001% of American society (I am being VERY generous here).
Damn! I can't believe I made a typo in the title.  I hope this doesn't become popular, damn, that's embarrassing...
Don't feel bad for her.  All she has to do is admit she's in over her head and step down.
This quote says it all:  "I think it’s fair to say that if you were designing a better C from scratch these days, you probably wouldn’t end up with C++."
Eid Mubarak everyone.  I'm out here in Illinois. 1/2 the state is doing it it by ISNA which is tomorrow, Oct 1st. The other 1/2 is waiting for the moon and will probably do it on Thursday.  Either way, Eid Mubarak! Inshallah all of you will have a blessed Eid with your loved ones!
&gt; One of the things I dislike about Obama is his choice for vp.  The last thing the Democrats need now is any form of criticism from the left. The idea is to just get the fuckers elected, so we can avoid another four years of absolute hell. Once they're in power, we can criticise. But for the moment Obama and Biden are our only hope.
Hey, i was just out, and a truck went past with a load of treated pine timber. Logs here are treated with CCA – (Chromium Copper Arsenate).  I've always thought the army stuff was a preservative of some sort. It *is* green, and although army stuff is green anyway (!) maybe it's something like that.
You're an idiot, did you know that?  How exactly does someone with *zero* power overrule the Supreme Court?
Baby's Tears and Ground Faerie's Wings.  Yes it's cruel, but they burn astoundingly cleanly.
I can't name any newpapers I read regularly.  But that's because I don't read newspapers anymore. 
Personally, no. But judging by your comment, I'd bet you automatically downmod anything submitted from Daily Kos, right? So, what would really be the difference anyway?
I had a teacher in high school who looked pretty much like Kyle Chandler, and we all adored him, he was a super nice guy too.  
Looks like a [dire bear](http://www.penny-arcade.com/comic/2005/06/29/).
You are correct, I had thought it was per account so it does indeed make a big difference.
If I recall, the PS2 emulation on some models was for specific games only.  Maybe in an update in a year or two once PS2 sales have totally tanked will we see PS2 emulation.  It can't be all that hard for Sony, they have all the specs and the machine definitely has the power.
It seems like you're talking past me. The annotation would stick with the compiled code, much like it obviously must do now.  The only thing I'm really saying is that it seems such properties could be defined without an explicit syntactic keyword, but having a more general and somewhat dynamic (in the expandable sense) facility.   void @nothrow f();  int @const v;  Where nothrow/const could be defined in terms of a more-isolated compiler module.  But maybe this is too general too soon. And perhaps the parser is written such that all these keywords don't actually conflict with the name of user variables.
Or a responsible citizen...
Unless mom wants to start putting out...  ...I'd suggest she withhold on the judgment. 
My main complaint is the lack of unicorn storage.
I wasn't planning on voting (how can you when Obama doesn't support you nor oppose shit-- he is for the bailout). But I'll definetly vote against anyone who supported the bail out, thanks. And I'll vote 3rd party for president.
Lets forget that british bankers funded the assassination of abraham lincoln, and gave us a fiat money system... How many countries in europe speak nazi?  They should keep certain things in mind, jokes or not.
&gt;the Internet has a tendency to give the complainers a louder voice  It's true.
It's a Dunkin Donuts.
Bears? Oh, I thought this was about Bear Stearns. My bad. GRRRRRRRR.
lots of californians move to seattle or oregon or las vegas, phoenix and various cities in texas where you can get gigantic homes. i picked florida but i wouldnt recommend it.
You trust the DMV, but you don't trust Rock the Vote...?
"Love your country always. Love your government when it deserves it."  -Mark Twain
Ah yes, but they end up drinking much better coffee as well.
&gt; Hedge fund star John Paulson of Paulson &amp; Co., for example, made $15 billion in 2007, largely by using CDS to bet that other investors' subprime mortgage bonds would default.  *This* is where the 700 billion is going - straight into these bastards pockets. 
I see what you did there.
my point was that they hold the possibility of a stock market crash over our heads for public support through fear. today proves that it isnt about the stock market. 
Ron Paul would tell you to let that pony go free.
Man, right in the middle of some good stuff is life. 
Ok, if you take up arms on the side of the Nazis and then get your ass handed to you, doesn't that by definition disqualify you from protesting about being insulted?
And yet everyone knows he's a moron. Why does Sarah Palin get a free pass? Oh yeah, she's decent looking.
  Ulteo Virtual Desktop
Thanks for offering your standard Obamatard response.  In addition, thanks for offering the standard Obamatard attempt at shouting down opposing opinions.  Keep it up shitbirds - you'll find out exactly what the 2nd Amendment is for.
Woman over 40 (barely).  Argumentative procrastinator who craves distraction.  Reddit satisfies all of my weaknesses.  Introduced to reddit by guy friend who knew my proclivities, but it wasn't until someone called Sarah Palin a feminist that I felt compelled to "play."  Hooked ever since.  
my mother became eligible to vote just in time to vote for hoover.  she never voted again.
and just like real candy, too many clips of Palin make your stomach hurt.
Let me give you guys a little tip, the Old Town Ale House is the tavern next to Second City (improve and comedy), so I would take the owner's comments about as seriously as The Onion. 
so basically it worked
Thanks nelson!  I've been trying to find the context for quite some time now.  :)
All you have to do is just start rattling off names of newspapers and mags, this is the easiest thing to even lie about...
I can buy that. I think the reason that it usually bugs me is because when people use the term "encryption" for hashing, they really think that there's some magical key-based encryption going on (just google for "how do I decrypt a hash?") - it's misleading, and generally exposes a lack of understanding about what's happening when data is hashed.  Of course, that's not to say that it wouldn't be awesome. If I could encrypt anything I wanted down to a 32-byte string, I'd make a *killing* on compression and rich media streaming technologies. :D
Fuck being fair, you're not running for VP. Moreover, I'll bet $1,000 to a bottle cap that you actually can *name* some of the sites you read. She failed to do even that.
Look, you're clearly more interested in making this a troll/ pissing contest and hurling arrogant insults rather than having an honest back-and-forth. The Stock Market =| Credit Markets. You've got interconnected banks failing all over the place, the President of the United States practically pleading with the American people about the severity of what's going on, and world leaders from Europe to Japan calling for the US Congress to get off its ass and do SOMETHING about this before it takes down the whole thing.  We're talking systemtic risk here to the global money system - not a single fucking airline, automaker, dotcom, or your average "large corporation" going chapter 11.  And btw, maybe everything is 'fine' becuase all the central banks of the world have literally been pumping billions of dollars into the markets every day for weeks. It's not just all working itself out...but I digress, we had a relief rally in the stock market, the dow's up, your job is safe, and you can turn a witty phrase, so it's all good. You "win." Happy? 
Why wouldn't you trust the DMV, and why would you trust MTV??
She could have said "digg"
Kid catlebry, I'm an older man. I got yer pack. I mean, yer back.
That's 'Zompocalypse'
Thank you reminding me why I don't choose to live in Zimbabwe. Yes, those are the best places to live, but that doesn't mean much in a world of racist immigration policies, obsessive security, repressive taxes and regulation, corruption bordering on fascism, poverty bordering on slavery, and war. Put a free country in the middle of Ontario and watch it thrive. They haven't had to deal with people like Bush, Saddam and Stalin. Live a few years under a middle eastern dictator and I promise you will begin to recognize the risk of centralized power. You just don't know what you're talking about. Your ideologies are cute, in a childish kind of way. The American founders created a nation of sovereign individuals for a reason, they were fighting an oppressive dictator in England, their ideas didn't arise in a vacuum.
It's the useless system that is at fault, not the people or their attitudes. In Australia we have a strong two-party system, but we have preferential voting that is geared to give the smaller parties  a certain amount of influence in the senate, etc, making a vote for minority party (or whomever) not a "wasted vote".
The bridle, sandals and hair are brown.  His skin looks like the correct color.  Are you trying to imply that Jesus was an African-American?
The diesel is actually bio-diesel though...  made from rendered fijians, so it's carbon neutral.
this is like the 18th time I've seen this before:  [2 months ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/6s5xz/bush_our_long_national_nightmare_of_peace_and/).  [2 months ago](http://www.reddit.com/comments/6sba2/bush_our_long_national_nightmare_of_peace_and/)  [3 years ago](http://www.reddit.com/comments/4530/bush_our_long_national_nightmare_of_peace_and/c048ck0)  Not to mention the number of times it's appeared in the comments:  [2 months ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/6sp7o/39_years_ago_today_this_was_the_headline_of_the/c04riy3)  [8 months ago.](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/64zws/unless_im_missing_something_this_country_is_in/c02usdg)  [1 year ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/n5ok/thank_god_for_george_w_bush/cn6ib)  [1 year ago](http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/23cgr/revised_patriot_act_will_make_it_illegal_to_read/c23evt)  Actually I just saw it a few days ago, and so while I love this particular piece of the onion. Is it really necessary to keep submitting this over and over again? Based on the way reddit catalogs things, given how many time it's been submitted, you really had to mangle the URL to even get this to post.  Fucking beating a dead horse senseless for some karma. Fuck off and stop destroying the things I love.
It's quite easy for someone else to say "What about it?" but if you were forced by your body to eat very little or else gain weight, I'm fairly sure you wouldn't be so blithe.   And yet, all of my doctors, even knowing my metabolism is slow, have recommended exactly what I'm doing.  And to get proper nutrition, it's imperative to eat at least 1000 a day for a woman of my size. Which I did yesterday. On days I do not workout, I eat 1000-1200. On days I don't, I eat 1400. I have to take vitamins and minerals to ensure I'm not damaging my internal organs by eating so little. I'm well educated in my body and what I need to do to be healthy. My doctor has told me I'll never be in the "healthy" weight range but that I am healthy.   So go be smug and think you know everything and that any woman that needs to lose weight is just lazy, and should appreciate her slow metabolism because she gets to "spend less money on food than other people". Asshole.
none of these objects can be found in a thrift store or resale, therefore NONE of them are green in any way shape or form.
Naw.  The ballot is mailed to my registered home address.  Once the vote is enclosed in the envelope, I sign across the seal.  The signature is then compared to my signature on file.  Very simple.  I've voted absentee for many years.  Clean.
As a conservative, you probably wouldn't want McCain in the White House, either.  And if they continue to get away with more election fraud, we're far more screwed than we ever would be regardless of who the next president is.
money shots... hmm  I wonder if they photoshopped in more "champagne"
That nytimes.com thingie in the URL box there is a news-"paper" :)
or perhaps the *Wrong* field
The problem is that the Democratic and Republican parties, though in reality representing only a quite narrow segment of the country, convey the appearance of diversity well enough to convince most people of their validity. Actually, the even larger problem is that most Americans really *are* better represented by one of the two major parties than by any of the third parties. The committed block you describe is, I do not believe, large enough to exert the influence you imagine. It is not insubstantial, but that means 8-10% at the very most. Most Americans are basically moderate, and though many of them could be persuaded relatively easily to be sympathetic to progressive causes, the figures most prominently attempting that persuasion are the *worst possible people* for the purpose.
OH is.
ONLY leafy greens? You need to have a properly-balanced diet if you're diabetic.
yeah, but his are cool.
The title is misleading, but Zakaria does make a very good point.  CNN is just reporting what he said.
&gt; He has his degree, doesn't he?   Sure, but he didn't when he accomplished a lot of amazing things in his career. So, clearly, a degree doesn't have much to with anything.
I don't think that is quite fair.  One of them work hard to create a fictional universe out of thin air for the enjoyment of the masses.  Building up a carefully constructed self reinforcing environment despite the continual need to ignore reality as we know it.  Then again, the Simpsons writers aren't bad either.
Pimco is  a center of balance and is going to provide the nutz and botlz go-to-guys for the Obama administration.   I have posted some Pimco personalities over the last two weeks.  I like the company. 
I have never written code that sucked, just a lot of code that could have used some tidying up here and there.
Already have mine :D
Correction Killed Trees!! But I agree, I get my news from the net not the papers their to slanted to whoevers in charge of said papers.
Then go eat the meatball sandwich that calls himself Ron Paul.
Contact list:  http://www.senate.gov/general/contact_information/senators_cfm.cfm
I'm pretty sure that elephants will come back to the skeleton of a deceased member of its tribe (?) and scatter the bones about. They seem to have an concept of Death.   As far as ants sacrificing themselves, you can view it in the same light that most worker ants are female and forego reproduction for the benefit of the colony. I'm pretty sure this has to do with the genetics of social insects that somehow results in the a worker somehow being more related to its sisters than it would be to its own offspring. Bio class was a long time ago and don't know if this holds true for all social insects.
More like a brown Roman.
Two men were fishing in a boat and wanted to smoke, but neither one had any matches. One of the men threw a cigarette overboard--that made the boat a cigarette lighter.
good one!
Absolutely. Rule #3 of politics is that you must repeat what you say many many times before people will understand or believe it. So keep going, Mr. Letterman.
Bollocks.
budweiser? (nope!)
Painful and shitty.  Why aren't you going to treat it?
Why?   http://maps.google.com/maps?f=q&amp;hl=en&amp;geocode=&amp;q=E+Franklin+Rd+%26+36th+Ave+NE,+Norman,+OK&amp;sll=37.0625,-95.677068&amp;sspn=45.197878,72.685547&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;ll=35.271726,-97.390795&amp;spn=0.01144,0.024376&amp;t=h&amp;z=16   That's where he lives btw :)   (On the southwest corner.)
what's with reddit user swampswarrow?   who is he and what did he do?
Because the Assyrian Empire was a really peaceful place.
He must not live in a state where the federal government had to take the dmv over because they were caught giving essentially "fake" driver licenses.
It takes about 5 seconds to put a condom on.  It doesn't even have to be an awkward pause, particularly if s/he does it for you, but with this it is guaranteed to be.  "You're spraying that all over my fucking sheets!  What was the problem with the Trojans again?"  And then the fun is over.
Another good one.  How is extradition there?  
its complicated
Had you read the article, you would have found the section that addresses this very complaint:  &gt;Who else is running?  &gt;Candidates include Independent Ralph Nader (polling about 2% or 3%) and Libertarian Bob Barr (polling about 1%) and a host of other third-party and independent candidates.  &gt;I have been criticized for not paying more attention to third party candidates. In leaving them out, I am not making any comment on their suitability to be president. Rather, I am acknowledging the fact that their probability of becoming president is near-zero.  &gt;A vote for president does two things: first, it has a chance of actually making the difference that gives one candidate a win. Second, it records a tally which can be reflected on later, regardless of the winner. A cote for a third party candidate has no effect on the first issue (which is what this FAQ is about) but does have an effect on the second. In fact, I have exercised this option in the past, voting for a third party as a protest, because I wanted to record the fact that I was not satisfied with the two-party choices (also, I was in Massachusetts, where the winner of the state's electoral votes was not in doubt). If you want to know your options for recording a protest vote, you'll need a different FAQ. 
Why? Is it because he's an asshole, or because his "music" reeks?
Well... Obama is also recently wealthy too, and to a much greater degree.
For fuck's sake woman, just say, "The New York Times" or Fox News or something. I think she's being overly defensive, and refusing to comply with anyone's even mild request and ending up digging herself in even deeper.
To be entirely fair, the buyer did talk like a fag and his shit was fucked up.
Bahahahahaha.  Right - they're the best places in the world to live, but that totally doesn't mean anything.  You're a fun joke.
I guess she believes that any day now, she's going to have to decide whether or not to become a homosexual.  That's probably why she can't focus on foreign affairs right now.
So... whatever happened to Plan 9?
I understand that.  I probably should have been more specific so I didn't mislead 90% of my audience, who know nothing about encryption or what a hash function is.  And yes, if you could encrypt anything to any relatively small size regardless of the plaintext, I would probably be applying to work for you.  haha
That's what I said(?)
goosebumps choose your own scare
facts and logic are for l0sers.  lolololol.  hello i be mainstream amerikun.
Andre Braugher  damn right.  he needs to be at the top of that list
i remember that game, f-ing hilarious.
I could not in good conscience vote solely on the issue of guns, but I can certainly see how the second amendment is meant to put teeth into the first amendment.  I have a friend who is a single issue voter in this way.  He knows a LOT of people who believe that the Republicans are the answer for the gun community.  I see the line between the parties blurring in this area.
It was disqualified for kicking too much ass.
That never was and never was intended to be a "security system".  Windows 9x doesn't have such a thing.  That box is simply a way to enable explorer to automatically connect to network drives and printers.
I'm pretty sure that this is a case where she doesn't know what the Mcain approved answer is. Being the republican that she is she doesn't want to be off message. 
Or make it red or something?  Maybe flashing ... spice it up!
No, GWBush is, and he's still the fucking president.
You're not in her target demographic:  you can read, you knuckles don't drag on the floor, you have more than 50% of your teeth, and there are fewer than 8 months of the year where you get your kicks spending a whole weekend going out and just blowing shit up.  Online afterward, we need to highlight that she managed to NOT answer MANY of the questions, and the ones she DID answer were horribly wrong and dangerous.  Or just point out all the lies that are certain to be there.
they're just trying to preserve their cheeseteak monopoly
Furthermore, it's clear that the poster has no interest in the thread, since he/she hasn't commented.
Every time a repeat offender like **maxwellhill** submits a US elections article to the worldpolitics subreddit, you should downmod everything he has submitted in the past 24 hours.
==&gt; Over 42% of the stock market is owned by the richest 1%  Well ... ... ... yeah. That's kinda the definintion of "rich", isn't it?
Oh, man. I totally dated a girl like that.
Are you thinking what I'm thinking Pinky?
Here's the full video: http://www.cbsnews.com/video/watch/?id=4490713n  Around the 7 minute mark I think I can visibly see anger bubbling just below the surface in Couric's face, as Palin talks about her stance on abortion.
And even if it does, there was one guy who had half his brain destroyed by a bullet, and remained conscious the entire time. He still can't walk, but he's pretty much fine otherwise.
No, but I'll probably return at some point for another degree. Why?
Well, the way I see it - the DMV is going to have your information anyways when you register for a license.
Haha, I came here to see if I was the only that did that.
That's a concept. This new one is going into mass production.
&gt; Find out on October 29, when the Weekly Reader results are announced!  That's great! Or I can wait like 5 days and find out for real.
And a awe inspiring 82% disapprove of Congress. But of course that is just spill over from Bush who is responsible for all crimes in all of history.
HEY! They're *fair* **and** *balanced*.
Yes.  It sure is. Bible College Cadre and diploma mill MBAs.  Oh and male whores with free access to the White House.  
Funny how it says this guy isn't very young.  Maybe you should check this out as a refutation.  http://cannabisnews.com/news/14/thread14801.shtml At least for you young kids.
If you were married, you'd know that you never get used to marriage in its straight form or any other form.  ;)
I told you.  Get the info or I make you look like an asshole. http://www.reddit.com/r/reddit.com/comments/74i7a/reddit_user_schuyfi_sent_me_an_email_saying_that/
Agreed, though the term "Bailout" means nothing, it is just how the administration is branding it for the American people, I used the same term since essentially they are attempting to inject money into domestic and foreign banks to "bailout" the economy. Definitely different scenes here, and one has to wonder if this new "injection of money" and loan from foeign banks is not more nefarious than the original 'bailout' plan that was being proposed. At least with that one they gained equity, this seems more like a loan and increase in mint that we get nothing out of, unless you count consoling foreign markets.
Did you read the part about why he only focuses on two candidates?
probably the part where he threatened to keep her grandchildren from her. just awful.
Also applies to movies that make more revenue than any other movie in history.
These kids are going to be voting based on who looks cooler, who's gotten more exposure, whose name sounds better, who has the catchiest slogans, and who they've heard the most buzz about. I would submit that the reason they've been so accurate in the past is, sadly, because this is ultimately the most accurate measure of how the electorate as a whole makes its decisions. This says more about America than it does about the election.
That's the only reason I'm voting it down.  Plus I'm feeling sassy. 
His site is down. Maybe he should use Perl?
John McCain sucks and all, but thats peddling fear. Something everyone should be against no matter what it is. Let people figure out that its a bad idea by themselves. :\
John Hodgman's jokes.
Three haunting possibilities here:  1) never paid attention and can't remember  2) never actually read a newspaper or magazine  3) Her primary news source is Playboy articles
....gasp....
Their only fear was YOUTUBE! Maybe the flight crew knew that they had let the child fuss for too long and did not want future passengers to fear a miserable flight. You are so right...parents only need to think of others...specially when everyone is confined to a closed space. Demanding that the tape be deleted or risk arrest is just SCARY!!!
Nader is a well liked individual. He is the pioneer of the concept of consumer movements. He invented the consumer movement here and is the model for consumer movements all of the world. He has always been very high profile and very well liked. He is one of the most trusted individuals in the country. He is precisely the best candidate for this given his external profile.
He said it.  Vote up.  
If a *little* self-control was all that was needed, you would be right to be amazed.
i'm convinced
I know this should be on the bacon subreddit...but i have to share... http://baconsalt.com
What is your opinion of a hookah?
&gt;Sarah Palin on Tuesday called herself a “Joe-six pack American” and said that her family has lost $20,000 in the stock market because of the financial meltdown on Wall Street.  HA HA HA, OH WOW
Stress was always the biggest factor for me. Plus because of stress I took heartburn meds, and ate fast food b/c of low willpower. Get good health stress and exercise. Avoid stress that leads to anxiety and avoid laborious work that takes away you exercising energy.
One can also point out that McDonalds is far more reputable then the US Government.  Nobody believes a single word the US Gov releases. And why would they? Government policy is to lie on all matters big and small to the ends of trying to control your perception.  The Government in fact exists to preserve lies for the wealthy masters of our civilization. Hence the corrupt nature of Modern America both corporate and governmental.   Things in the USA will continue to erode and worsen as there is no manner of legal action that can be taken to save it, and the people simply have no stomach for violent revolution.  They know that, that is why there is little or no effort to keep all this hidden from you.  Cuz there aint shit you working stiffs are gonna do about it!!! 
Please vote up.
Katiegate!
SHUT UP HANNITY.  I doubt you know what your talking about, but you're accidentally stumbling close enough to some reasonable arguments that you are DISCREDITING THEM BY ASSOCIATION.  Just STOP and a go back to calling Obama a Muslim or whatever it is you do.
They should probably pay 50%.
I'm not financially savvy enough but isn't it somewhat less exposed than the large banks? And why do the banks keep advocating anti-credit union legislation?
 fib(1643)=   1040418170 9125834600 8830113764 2034508078 7426095504 8168009048 0314348946 7606592377 5434831137 7181765067 5069449142 4198920309 6876938267 8555705523 8079071096 5410443626 0310565162 1616843436 7454391531 3751521110 6901569576 4113329668 7317345412 5065316087 6326365940 3717012290 7203878684 7853020521 1188564783 4001324969 5145754977 9652764513 9828248486 3872685082 9337
Vote up for not accepting tolerance.
So, we will be able to buy new pants half as often?
If John McCain wins, HE will be POTUS. And if that does not scare the hell out of you, it should.
Wow.  First and foremost, THANK YOU (seriously) for your thoughts and opinions.  i want to respond (since I'm the 'clueless blogger" in question) in a moment.  But let me clarify something, which i obviously failed to do in this post (actually, if you read the firt installment I DO clarify better, so perhaps I should put that heading up top for the next entries to avoid issues in the future).   So let me clarify here first:  I was referring to (and confused by) MAINSTREAM PORN.  What you so rightly and aptly describe in your killer comments is, to me, more on the fetish tip of things, or kink, or 'subsets" of "mainstream" sexuality, if you will.  I said in my first post and will repeat it here:  i am neither naive nor judgemental; whatever gets someone off, as long as both parties consent and there's no permanent damage, is A-Okay with me 'cause it simply isn't any of my business. So what I am pointing out is how these qualities have 'bled over", if you will, into "mainstream porn" (i.e., the titles you find commercially and in widespread release, titles you would find in the 'straight' category of any DVD shop, NOT - repeat NOT - in the Fetish or BDSM or Kink section.  Again, your comments were (in my view) 100% correct when it comes to those categories.  But what confuses me is you go to see a porn scene, one released from, say, Vivid or Wicked or Red Light or Voyeur Media, and the choking and gagging and slapping is all over those!  The next three posts will continue to explore other aspects of mainstream porn and its' 'trend" towards violent (or, "intense") sex scenes.   I guess what I'm saying is: options seem to be closing up; if you WANT to watch more "vanilla" sex (and I'm not saying you have to, or it's right to, or whatever) then your options are becoming more and more limited.  For example: After reviewing 300 mainstream and commercially available porn DVDs 91% of them featured, in almost every single scene, two guys fucking one girl.  Tomorrow's post will be on this subject.  Two times the fun or two times the intensity?  What if you only want to watch two PEOPLE doing it?  Then what? So again, your comments were 100% right on target if we were discussing fetish or BDSM or whatever.  But I'm talking about the kind of porn you find in hotel rooms late at night, or on 'YouPorn'. In conclusion; if slapping or choking or being intense turns someone on, great!  But why must that be de rigeur for almost every single porn scene currently being produced by mainstream porn producers?
If you work at a pizza place in the South, you get used to hearing "I can have some ranch with that?"
&gt;and the sex is great, and even as your hanging upside down, penetrating her anus on a kite swing over a piano while she wears that lovely pink leather mask with the zipper across the mouth that you love; something is missing.  Yeah.. somethings missing.. 
Awesome! Now who has a Win98?
This is the biggest argument I have with my girlfriend all the time...  Especially milk...  I REFUSE to drink milk if it is even 1 day BEFORE being expired. If it leaves a ring around the container, its got to go!
I lived in Alaska for 20 years. Now I travel all over the other states (CA, NY, IL, UT, TX, etc, etc).  Alaska is not a microcosm of America.
Nice link!
The first few workouts really DO hurt. But most people don't realize that after that you just feel better and better.
I got that letter too. Such a shame more people didn't listen to him. I am a Paul supporter, but I still love me some Dennis Kucinich!
Affects.
He is making a statement but is unsure of its veracity and is inciting a possible verbal confirmation?
This will be a great way to pay for the Bailout. Start taxing hate filled Mega churches.
I'd wear that.
Proctor and Gamble, for example. They don't have a hedge fund, and people will keep buying their toothpaste, even in a recession. Good, sound company, now $10 cheaper than last week.
OooooOooo he's fucking scared. I guess that Libby pardon really stirred up some anger. Oh wait, it didn't.
&gt;In 2004 America "reelected" a president who had abused alcohol, drugs, conducted an illegal war, outed a CIA agent, and pretty much shredded the constitution.  But could those issues be wrapped up in a bite-sized, media-friendly name like "Troopergate"?  Nah, I'm just joshin' ya. We're fucked.
The voteforchange.com site I would imagine bought some lists that have a registered voters that were provided by your states' State Department. The accuracy of these lists and their frequency of update vary state by state. Frequently contested states will typically provide better lists (as the number of requests in these states is likely to be much higher). I live in Massachusetts and our list is more than a year out of date. Luckily, this will likely err on the side of indicating you are not registered even though you are.
Don't worry, roxxe. I get the reference.
Oh you know, Creationism Weekly, The Jesus Digest, Copter Hunting Connoisseur, all of them.
That's reddit.
In what language do you instantiate objects with the class keyword?
KILL IT!!
Yes - heroes - the House Republicans alone saved the US - for now.   The senate is going to vote on the same proposal as early as Wednesday, and if it passes there it is likely to get rammed back down into the House. So call it a temporary stay of execution.
a moderator and top submitter of the things reddit.  things.reddit.com
Warren buffet has come out several times and said his rate is a little over 30%. where are you getting this? Or are you some jackass tool just shooting your mouth off?   Even if they did, and clearly I don't believe you (you aren't supporting your interjection because you can't), even if they did, they don't pay 40% of ALL taxes, they pay a fuckload less. 
http://pa.lindro.me?w=279
Italian shoes
I was going to say something, but then saw your username and my mind went totally blank.
whoosh!
safety deposit box. this is what banks used to be until they decided that they could loan out more than they had because everyone would not want all of their money back at the same time.
But democrats don't rig elections, republicans do. They're the riggers.
Free Katie from Guantanamo Bay! Donate now!
w3.org
I'm beginning to think she's actually Ricky Gervais's new character.
Market forces know better how to correct this situation than the government. Again, get an education.
I don't see how you(they) could fuck this up so bad, and not notice.
weirdness
16/29 (Theres the one for ladies only)  eh i got 8 years to work on the rest
I can has democracy nao?
Crab people do.
The Vote up Nazi's think there is a standard title format that must be adhered to.  Primarily, there is no format other than you can't say Vote Up.  I personally find it a more concise poll like function myself so I don't care, but certainly many people post titles made to get votes more than made to inform.  However we should judge by content, not by format of the title.
No, I think I mean tax.  I'm referring to import duties, which are based on the item value, and dictionary.com defines the relevant definition of 'duty' thusly:   10. Chiefly British. tax: income duty.  Import duty IS most definitely a tax on the importing of products, the percentage of the 'value' that is added is varied based on product type, and ISTR that software is taxed fairly heavily on import. Sadly, I can't check, as the amount of taxes due for import of products is a 'secret' that a company has to pay to have access to.
I bet I could get it up for 100 blowjobs.
Im Australian and I can name at least 2 newspapers from the US.  (On a side note, can anyone name 2 Aussie newspaper without searching?)
Why is this whole thing starting to feel like a setup?  They have managed to lower the expectations for this debate so far that she basically has to show up and not shit her pants on stage to win..
The best explanation I've found of how these things work is this graphic on wikipedia:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Image:Risk%26ReturnForMBSInvestors.png
I'm not depressed.
If I remember correctly, in 98, you could just boot to DOS and delete a password file in the windows directory.  Deleting the file, deleted the password for the user and allowed you to login with no password.
&gt;Hm. Generally, it's better to set the defaults to something most of your users will like than something you like.   How do you know most users don't like the font?   &gt;Obviously this doesn't apply if you don't care what your users think or hate them.  That's a luxury people who give away their stuff have. It's great when you don't have to worry about marketing, customers, increased shareholder value, and all that other insane shit.  You do what you want. If other people like it they use it otherwise they can use something else.  I guess the biggest problem is the people who use it shit on you anyway instead of just using something else.  That seems out of line to me.  If you don't like it don't use it but don't piss on the developer and ruin it for everybody else.   I think people who shit on open source developers are the worst kind of useless obstructing scum there is. They are polluting the pool we are all swim in.
I'll bet the others can name a SCOTUS case other than Roe v. Wade.  It's past time for incurious fucktards to get out of government.
These motherfuckers simply don't know how to shut the fuck up. It is official that they are completely useless, taking up space and resources only to spout more nonsense in the world.
-"Patriotism is the virtue of the vicious," according to Oscar Wilde. -where are the guidance chips?
scriptz, lulz.
The only thing I can't stand more than Jim Rome is his goatee. Someone needs to kill it.
Except their asses.
if there is no debt and no credit... then the nation has no money... it runs on debt, relies on the lifetime debt of its citizens, but the citizens need to have prices, tax policies and time to work within that system, none which the citizens have.
Indeed. I read:  &gt; Here's our list of the dozen greatest deaths in the history of science fiction. With some spoilers, natch.  And as it appeared to be mostly TV and movies and books from (alternatively) 4, 3, and 2 decades ago, a book that came out less than a month ago I will admit surprised me. Not that I disagree with what was said. I didn't click the "click here if you've read" link of course!
Such [adorableness](http://www.flickr.com/photos/powerpig/1351540365/in/set-72157600129693607/) looking through the rest of his pics of the critters. 
No true single-issue gun voter gives a shit about political parties. We evaluate each candidate on his or her position on the RKBA - and that's it.  You see, that's what "single-issue" voter means.  The fucking traitor Obamatard wing of the Democrat Party doesn't seem to grasp this and has ignored us at their peril - in spite of the pleadings of Bill Clinton to FUCKING DROP THE GUN ISSUE, in spite of pleadings by various Democratic Party operatives.  If most Republican candidates have a good RKBA record, guess what - we vote for them.
It's not even like her answer to that question matters, but it's just her reflex to avoid answering anything.  I think she'd already started avoiding the question before she even realized what the question was.
 Left Look petty?! This is not a left or right issue - stop polarizing it.  It is common sense.  My 9 year old brother could name you 10 diff. newspapers and magazines he reads.   This just shows how out of touch she is.  She is a an absolutely self-indulgent, ignorant, hypocritical and vindictive individual and this needs to come out. 
It is, the one on Moosic St. I love it.
What was it supposed to say?  I can't figure it out.
There are always jobs popping up for a web designers.
when it's the one who has helped the city beyond anyone's expectations, it's a good thing.  *edit:* This is my opinion as a New Yorker living in Brooklyn who actually sees and lives with the real-world effects of Bloomberg as Mayor.  I absolutely understand the issue of setting a dangerous precedent, but here, I view this as a victory of common sense. (Also, he still has to run for re-election, so that's not exactly a dictator.  He's not going to kill people who don't vote for him.  This isn't Zimbabwe)  In addition, wasn't the term limits originially put in place to get rid of Koch?  (I could be completely wrong on that)
That's exactly what I was thinking. Only some artsy gay faggot that's a queer homosexual would want to know the resolution.
Not entirely true, but yes if it is habitual.
She's beautiful but this photo has too much photoshop in it.  Photographer needs to back off of the BarbieDoll filter a little bit. 
Agreed.  There's an easy to way to test:  if they float in regular water, they must be filled with gaseous byproducts, so they aren't good.  Just be sure that you wash the shell and your hands thoroughly before you puncture it and expose the inside to any microorganisms or their waste that has accumulated.
And I am here too...
 What's the point of linking to this?  Unless you put it in WTF...
or Windex
 #! /usr/bin/env python  from reddit import *  Reddit.downvote()
Cbender35 got really bent about this person's comments in their last post.  Please check the comment history for schyfi's post before taking this at face value.  That said, I don't disagree with cbender35's comments in that post but I do think he is being a total douche with this post and he should knock it the fuck off. 
let me guess, you're wearing a tinfoil hat and there's a Ron Paul poster over your computer.
Hey, have you seen "Star Wars"? --- I thought it sucked. The plot was miserable and the people who like it are fools.  Those who worship it and swear by it ... you know, the ones who go to conventions full of fans ... well, they're complete idiots.
I'm pretty sure there will be only 3 stupid parts where she's concerned: the beginning, middle, and end.
arsenic is tasteless i believe so i would think not.
I'm not even going to bother voting because if you wants things done right you have to do it yourself not rely on somebody in a white house to make things better
You better take that first step and roll it back, because doing all twelve is gonna get in the way of our bacon binging.
i guess we should burn it then.
If vagina EVER walks in there.  Vaginas have a instinctive will to avoid tech. 
The same reason Obama kept saying "John is right" in the debate.
Unless it's a 1600x1200 where you can run it at 800x600 without artifacts.  I have a flat panel LCD for this very reason playing old 90s video games :)
"Make things as simple as possible, but no simpler"  "If you were any sharper you'd cut yourself."  "It is better to own the ladder than climb the ladder."  "Authority is only as good as the ordinary person pretending to be an authority."  "Give a man a fish, feed him for a day. Teach a man how to fish, feed him for a lifetime."  "There are two types of people in this world. Those who believe there are two types of people, and those who don't."  "Some people won't like you because you have two eyes."
If she's right, I may be gay?
I don't know about the fat part,  you are unfairly overlooking the herds of apathetic ignorant lean fucktards,  but other than that I reckon you nailed it perfectly.
She could have defaulted to her hometown or state newspaper.  You can't get any safer politically than that.
I agree that these are bad, but done right, blue LEDs look cool. My friend's laptop has an acrylic case that glows blue when its asleep and is a dime blue when awake.
Well, if the guy likes her to use a strap-on, I'd go for circular...
You roll an eighth into a single blunt? I'm coming to your house!
you heard that [Timothy Leary was an FBI informant](http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/americas/380815.stm) right?   He dobbed in the [weathermen](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Weatherman_(organization)), and led an entire generation away from society and into their own heads. Their sense of self-importance then led their newly inflated heads up their own arseholes. and by the time the trip wore off and their heads deflated, all that was left was giant arseholes. like goatse. 
It was a good response and worthy of a laugh.  I still don't trust him though.
He won’t vote for Democrats because they’re bigger?
Fundie spam
I happened to catch Maher on Conan O'Brien the other night. During his speech about some of the absurdities of religion, the crowd was *deathly* quiet. You could tell that some of these people in the audience were "Wait.. he doesn't believe in God?".
sounds like a song on a compilation CD by Wayne Brady. 
By now, you should know that copying and distributing any copyrighted material is illegal and is called piracy. You should also know that having any of these pirated materials in your possession is also illegal. While there are some differences in the types of piracy, the end of the line is that it is illegal and you could be charged and even face jail time for downloading, burning, copying, selling or owning pirated materials.
Music's got nothing to do with it. It's one thing to _like_ something, and it's a completely different thing to believe something is _true_ just because you would like it to be true.
However we don't know what would have happened to the Japaneese if they hadn't done the bailout. Otherwise though I completely agree. The whole consumer economy is a sham. 
HOLY SHIT YOU WON FREE BACON!  Congrats, it is a very needed subreddit.
She is such a bad ass she reads everything and cannot retain anything, not even the title. Stupid people will support other stupid people, that's the sad state of reality.
It's scary to think that there are people who were 9 in 2000. Get off my lawn!
Alternative title:  "Dell opens movie store to rival iTunes: with one title! No HD version."
&gt; So if we buy a lodge we will need to earn  &gt; $1,172,000 minus the $422,000 of tax (36%) to  &gt; buy the $750,000 lodge.  &gt; But my rich buddy, just earns $750,000 and  &gt; pays $0 tax. Yeah... nothing wrong there.  I'd rather earn what he does than what you claim to need. Next time I'm in the market for a lodge, I'll earn $750K, and watch you work for your $1172K.  Seriously: there is no reason that you can't do exactly what he does. Just follow the same algorithm.
What does the scanner say about his power level?
We can only hope...  Send this tart back to whatever nouveau rich cesspool she slithered out of....
do these crabs have new fucking haircuts and drink yaggerbombs at the clubs too
By going in I am not implying anything.  I don't have to state that I am a Catholic and they don't ask.  They don't even say that it is only for Catholics (you would have to know that ahead of time).  According to the church I still am a Catholic anyway.  I hear that it is pretty hard to be excommunicated (even if you ask nicely).
We'll worry about that when the time comes. With a little luck, we'll be outta here and it will be someone else's problem.
He is 100 % correct it's just that the "we" means him is friends and is family.
I think she's hip to the mini-page, but has trouble with the try 'n' find...
Nice part about NY is, no matter what I vote, the state will go to obama. God Bless NYC
this is world news, citizens are figuring out what they have to do... if nobody is in debt the system fails.
Was it a community college in Wasilla, AK?  Take a look.  http://www.cnbc.com/id/24791078  You need some more education buddy.
Creepy as hell, but kids singing or participating in almost any corporate/political/religious activity creeps me out.  Church choirs, Kidz Bop, the mickey mouse song, the daily national anthem/pledge of allegiance every schoolmorning....  This shit is creepy all right, but it's like anything else.
Fermions don't form condensates (i.e. a macroscopic number of them fall into the ground state). They are fermions.  In fact they do the opposite; they force each other into higher and higher energy states.  That is the essence of the Pauli exclusion principle.
&gt;Linux distros seriously need to just go ahead and decide on stable APIs and timelines (how long it will remain unchanged) for essential parts of the OS if we want any 3rd-party proprietary support.  How would you do such a thing? How would you punish the distros which didn't obey you?  You probably come from a business world where you would just fire any developer who didn't obey you and replace him with one that did. I don't think you realize that open source doesn't work like that.
Pussy.  Get over it.
I KNOW!!! And when that gay guy jiggled them on that awards show a couple of years back I thought **I** would blow.
Damn you, I was going to say, "It looks like he has a dangling pointer."
Luongo also sucks.
[I love the effect](http://wvs.topleftpixel.com/06/09/29/). Good old [tilt-shift lenses](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tilt-shift_photography).
Linear singly linked list: He has his right arm around her.  Linear doubly linked list: She has her left arm around him as well.  Circular doubly linked list: They're hugging.  Circular singly linked list: They're hugging, but only with their right arms.
"Can you name one, please?"  "ALL OF THEM!"
But mortgages are *already* a market. They're bought and sold all the time.
Pneumatic valves still use a cam. camshaftless valves are indeed being developed, but like i said nothing is production worthy.
Thanks, I'm making my local synagogues and churches aware of this.
It scary to be teaching and the majority of your class was born in 1992.  oy :( 
Not to play the contrarian here, but could you explain to me *exactly* why it couldn't be the same scene?
Because then Ron fucking Paul would be president. I think that's barely preferable to having Palin as the President.
LOLZZZ!!! She is going to be your president when john mcain dies in his first year of office from too much stress!!  Hahahaha ooooh man!!! hahahaha!.....BAWHAHAHAHA!!! /feint .  On a serious note: .....BAWHAHAHAHA!!! oooh man!! 
I'm not surprised the vm boxes are full, I sent a message to both my senators through their website.  I'm going to call tomorrow morning and hopefully get a human on the line.
how... un American. Telling them to give up a right like that makes you as bad as those who want to take them away.
Bingo.
Palin is hardly a "master" of anything
Wouldn't it be better if they began with &gt; module Main where
Well, Lackawanna County (where Scranton, PA is.. although I don't know exactly what diner that is) is one of the few liberal counties in Pennsylvania (because Scranton's it's one of the larger cities). So it's really not too surprising, if they are near Scranton. Try that in Tioga, Bradford, Lycoming, Sullivan County.. you'll get a different response, probably.
I've never understood the argument that polls don't influence popular opinion. Are you honestly suggesting that the American populace isn't easily manipulated and that everyone thinks for their self?
Damn, I feel old.
The bailout will only postpone the crisis. We can only recover once we hit bottom. There will be more financial failures even with the bailout. The DOW is going to tank. This bill is going to pass because of fear of the inevitable.
Even if you don't like it, you can still recognize that Luke wasn't from Dagobah.
Maybe I missed the sarcasm to the lack of balance in a "fermionic" condensate.  
OK, I'm not a McCain supporter AT ALL, but if I may:  The first one he was obviously serious. The second one he was obviously joking. that's how it appeared to me anyway.
Waiting for the Palin girls trio lesbian incest pr0n...  ...hopefully they can crank it out while Bristol is still pregers.
"Les Go Fast" was what the French police called a group of drug couriers who used high-end German cars to transport coke and weed throughout Europe. Carrying up to 1400lbs. of contraband, "Les Go Fast" were famous for using an SUV as a rabbit to spot the police and run over any police cars that tried to block the road. They didn’t go the stealth route, they simply drove soo fast that it would be too dangerous to try to stop them.
Nobody wins in war.
OK, how do you do code tags?
It shows that YouTube commenters are the most pathetic lifeforms that have (for the most part) grasped written communication.
... and it took us five years to notice?!
The problem is that she is too damned cutsie to be taken seriously. People are scared. They want someone who means business. Her attack Pomeranian act will not be taken seriously.
True. I guess there isn't any harm in registering twice (is there?).
Love 'em both.  No, Silly, not McClown and Obama - Amy Goodman and Dennis Kucinich.  Two heros in my book.  Amy and Dennis are looking out for everybody, and most people don't even know it.
That show is almost more painful to watch than O'Reilly.
Tell your mama to go home her pussy's sinkin' up ty house!
Wasn't Brodeur the "de-facto" captain of the Devils for a season after Scott Stevens retired?
Channel-Fireball-FORK combo...!
I doubt the card makers are selling the documentation.  They usually write the drivers themselves so as to keep their trade secrets.
Converting to Catholicism shouldn't be a prize for a game. I think we all understand the point you're trying to make. "It's super silly to believe that a cracker actually becomes the body of Christ, and because you wont be able to pick it out from a pile of unconsecrated crackers, that disproves the power of communion!" But seriously, you have you're own beliefs and the game you're posing for other people to partake in is imposing your beliefs on a group of people, EXACTLY what I'm sure you want to do right? Talking to someone about their beliefs in a respectful setting is alot more powerful than disrespecting them.
They are going to attach it to a bill that already passed the House, so the House will have to vote down something they want if they intend to block the bailout bill again. Contact list for your Senators:  http://www.senate.gov/general/contact_information/senators_cfm.cfm  Call them.  Fax them.  Email them.  Tell them what you think.
Depends on who you ask.
That's because Ben Bernanke has been letting the toothless hobo that sleeps under his desk make all the major decisions at the Fed since last October.
Actually my friend does exactly what you're saying.  I think Obama was/is ignorant that the language that he was using (guns for hunting) triggers a reaction that he is anti self-defense, collecting etc. I don't think he is. I think he has somewhat softened his stance on gun reform and it's to his credit he is not hiding the issue or even lying about it as I believe the "Maverick" may be.
old but still funny
And none too soon either! Dawkins is the hate-mongering high priestess of politikal korrekness. His ignorant ravings have set humanity back decades! The greatest accomplishment in his life would be to drop out of public view forever. And don't get me started on that pseudo university Oxnard!
You're absolutely right. There's no difference at all between Clinton and Bush or Kennedy and Nixon. No, sir. Not a smidge.  My, what a profound political secret you've stumbled onto. If only we sheep could understand. Nothing like setting an absurd, impossible goal, pointing fingers and cracking a cold one, waiting until the inevitable problems arise, just so you can say "I told you so."  Most of the problems in the US can be directly traced to lazy whiners like yourself who, instead of rolling up their sleeves to effect change, do nothing. No alternative, no proposition, just dropping a deuce on the floor.  Congrats.
The AP links to LiveJournal?
It dropped ~8% yesterday, where do you get 20% unless you are talking about all time highs.
This has got to be the dumbest post I've ever read. It was first posted on another forum, too.
INFP.  I'm also a Libra.  I'm too sensitive to be a dude.  Srsly.
Here here!  Well spoken Bruce!
You want to know why Americans will never revolt?   Consider what we as a nation have done to the world in our past and present; the shit we have taken from soo many other countries and all the crap we did to stay on top.   Now, if Americans revolted, what sort of "revolt" or plan would balance that fact as the rest of the world would take their opportunity to get a little retribution and the country itself fights in a promised civil war to any revolt?  Who has that sort of plan prepared? Who could balance that much madness? Who's willing to take on that job?  You wana know who?   Crazy fuckin Christians from everywhere's middle of nowhere in this country. That's who. And Americans know this.   They got the numbers, the guns, the planning and they think that they only need to fight till Jesus gets here, then they all vanish and go to heaven while he does the rest.   You think Muslim extremists are scary, imagine [THESE PEOPLE](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LACyLTsH4ac) leading the revolution.   And you know what. That sounds like a fucked up plan. 
The shotgun is actually not a very effective weapon against the zombie threat.  
That was fucking awesomeness itself!  Actually, no stockbrokers falling from sky.  They have to ritually disembowl themselves.  Then they get paid.
Sounds familiar.
yeah but you know what I mean!  "eat veggies &amp; fruit... cut down on sodium, fast food &amp; sweets etc etc" .... sounds like hell to me.
Did your video synch properly?
In this context, why would it be improper to mention the [trail of tears](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Trail_of_Tears)?
lol?
Ah, San Francisco, my home, my lifelong love. How easily we forget in this small sea of liberal tolerance and reason how many hateful, venal sickos populate the rest of the country.  SF is the #1 tourist destination in the world in America. She is universally hailed as one of the most beautiful cities in the world. I feel lucky to be here, and even more lucky not to be a Christian right-wingnut.
It comes with being a Republican.
The daily planet.
In my case YES!  Thanks for noticing.
Tang drink mix? Premade bacon bits? SURELY THERE IS SOMETHING BETTER!
Here, I would hope we could be intellectually honest. Save the dishonest "rah rah"s for political rallies and street demonstrations.
&gt; You don't need banks or credit unions.  &gt; You can save your money and delay purchases.  As taught by Islam!
Because Gen X and Gen Y relish the idea of being unmployed?
Unfortunately, if you live in Missouri, you can't print out a voter registration form and mail it in.  Some regulation against it because of the card stock used in their official registration forms.  [But you can request it here.](http://www.sos.mo.gov/elections/register2vote/)
&lt;blink&gt;!
already have seen it used against Obama.  Mostly just stuff about dear leader and how we are going to end up like North Korea.  
THAT IS BY FAR AND AWAY THE BEST NEWS THIS CANADIAN HAS HEARD ALL MONTH!!  The USA is now the World's largest yard sale and Canada on the other hand must look after its interests. We may not have a great government but whenever I contrast it to the USA or any so called free country outside of Europe I always end up seeing that Canada is doing very well. We are not the same as people from the United States and only rich city people have confusion with this fact. WE are proud, strong ,and free(ish).  Maybe some of you could come live here? Despite our Socialist tendencies to offer poor people some help now and again we are sure you will still like what we have done with the place...  Who knows maybe you could even overlook our universal health care and social support.   As for Conquering Canada. DREAM ON!! We will sell you down the river to China and Russia, and Europe faster then you thieves can say SOFTWOOD LUMBER if your Government even thought about it!!  And WTF are you gonna do about it? HUH? Don't you think we know how valuable our natural resources are, and don't you think we know how the USA operates in the shadows?  A future where America is just another nation in the World sounds just fine to most people....   And, low and behold the world has slowly been placing America in that position without ever firing a long range missile.. Good thing for all of you Politics abroad has many more shades then in the USA....  There is a high price to pay for allowing your nation to be run by extremists be they  religious or otherwise, and the check is now due....
Only at first. You don't have to eat super healthy. Pizza isn't that bad, hell even McHeartAttacks are okay in moderation. Just try and get a real meat and vegetables meal in once a day. Eat as much as you want, keep in mind that you should only eat until your not hungy however if you eat more it doesn't matter much. Get good steak and pork chops. Avoid potatoes white rice and white bread. Drink a glass of water with some sort of meal at least once per day. Load up on green veggies like beans. They're not amazing, but scarf a bunch down and move on to the awesome awesome steak. Allow time for food to digest after, and avoid stress for 30 mins.   That is not really the ideal food pyramid, but it is a HELL of a lot better than most of the fast food junkies I know. I used to never drink water, only drink soda and coffee, just eat fries and burgers, and never exercise. All of this mind you was due to an insane schedule and no money, but hey that's what college is about:-) Not that I recommend the lifestyle.   I've finally gotten into a real routine, and man I feel like a million bucks. It only takes a few months of workout out every 2nd day. Don't beat yourself up if you miss a day, just go the next day. Oh yeah... SCREW CARDIO. It's way too painful for a beginner to stay motivated, and if you are out of shape you'll be winded by lifting weights anyways assuming you don't take breaks between sets unless you have to.   Give yourself a month of freeweights to drop real pounds due to constant muscle rebuilding (eat protein! plus it tastes good too). As long as your doing some muscle training for your legs like deep knee bends you'll really surprise yourself when you hit the track in a month. You'll be lighter, stronger, and have better lungs than you even remember. Talk about motivation!
45% is still too much.
Upmod for cynical insight + *Swingers*.
I'm not sure, but it makes more sense than her logic of fewer export bans meaning more local oil.
She can't just appeal to her base. First of all, her base probably won't even be watching, they'll just pick up the positive-Palin spin on Fox News. Second of all, she could get on stage and bite a newborn's head off, and they'd still vote for her. They've decided.   It's going to be about winning over independents--many of who will be a big part of the audience, and then retaining the moderate fringe of her own party. There are two levels of each, the level that watches the debate, and the level that just catches the particularly interesting bits later. If she tanks, she'll lose the groups that actually watch the debate, and if she just loses, she loses independents. For those who just catch the sound bites... well, it depends on if either has a particularly bad moment (think Miss Teen South Carolina or Biden losing his temper with her stupidity), or if either has a particularly strong zinger.
They all suck. Maybe we should put them in a ring and let all of them fight to the death. The winner gets to live is life out on some island in the Bahamas. 
Since 2004? Let's see: 2004 had a Republican Congress and a Republican president and executive branch (read: Secretary of Finance, etc.). 2005 had a Republican Congress and a Republican president. 2006 had a Republican Congress and a Republican president. 2007 had a deadlocked Senate, a Democratic House, and that same Republican president claiming ever-more near-dictatorial powers. 2008 has had a deadlocked Senate, a Democratic House, and, yes, again, that same Republican president and executive branch.
Obscurity from lack of hardware support - the unfortunate fate of almost every non-mainstream OS.
I did not anticipate [that reaction](http://www.easyskunk.de/bilder/normal_crazy_cat2.jpg), well, if you are doing what you are suppose to, why the chip on your shoulder?, this is where ACCEPTING yourself comes in.  [There is a market for your product](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=41APzy5kqBU)  look, you have to agree with me that in 9 times out of 10, someone with weight issue ***does not practice eating well and exercising***. Hence why i had to ask.   Sucks to be you, but we are ALL dealt bad cards.   P.S. [I am actually bright.](http://www.cynthiavandepeppel.nl/fuck_you.jpg)   
i can see what you are saying.  I generally don't put much discussion into any submissions under the WATMM subreddit, mainly because most of the submissions i check out / post aren't news. Generally they are resources.  what you say makes scene, if it's tech news and discussions you are after WATTM is definitely not for you.
How did you type in the lines and arrows and what not?
Iowa City is my favorite city ever!!
I hope everyone is.
First, though, you need to actually know some names of magazines and newspapers.
I grew up with a Mega Drive. In fact, Nintendo wasn't very popular where I lived [at the time], it was almost Sega all the way.  I only had 8 games for my Mega Drive, but Sonic &amp; Knuckles locked on with Sonic 3 was about the only game(s) I played anyway.  I remember first doing the level select cheat for Sonic 3 and hearing that chime for the first time. Supposedly one of the hardest cheats to ever pull off. (Up, up, down, down, up, up, up, up while Sonic leaps forward after the Sega logo).  I also remember trying it on S3&amp;K for nearly an hour before finally realising that they changed the level select cheat in S&amp;K. (Left, left, left, right, right, right, up, up, up while the character is holding on to something (rope etc)).
If the nation really wanted to vote between Ron Paul and Dennis Kucinich, we would be. Reddit's intellectuals with time on their hands are not representative of the nation, or are our ideals going to appeal to most people.   Even better, why not more parties: Ron Paul Republicans, Obama/Clinton Democrats, Cheney NeoCons, Ralph Nader Greens and Kucinich Progressives, etc?
It has been demonstrated that when you have not yet voted and you believe your candidate faces losing that you will be less likely to vote.  You are a victim of fraud and interference in your right to be free from intimidation with regards to your right to vote.  I hope that you will keep trying to get your head around this.  The Republicans are convinced that "fake polls" are an effective voter suppression technique.  They keep using them.
But not because of their cops.
Obligatory in Russian thread:  In Soviet Russia, polonium like you.
OK, that's hilarious.
You don't need credit then! Just float the checks for a day! Print them on Friday and they won't clear 'till Monday at the earliest. Really you should have 2 months operating capital.
What part of:  &gt;Game Developers bear most of the burden, but the problem is no where near a simple one to solve  Did you not read?  It **can** be done, and it **has** been done, but it is not **easy** to do and most companies will not waste time doing it.
Why is his face all fuzzed out?
hmm... maybe I can get to finally go on SSI. And actually get back what I never thought I was going to live long enough to get. 
Uhh go north 20 miles to Cedar Rapids to where I live.  I'm looking out my apartment window right now and there are about 4000 vacant flooded houses across the river.  Ever night at least one is vandalized, looted, or burnt down and the cops are so spread out they can't do anything about it. All because our local government can't make a decision.  IC is a oasis in this state. 
&gt;A speechwriter "wrote" the speech for Harper, and now the guy is fired. If you hire someone to do work for you, you expect that the work is original. If not, you fire them.  Now he has a job as a pundit on Fox News, google around for Karl Rove, maybe you've heard of him?  &gt;Did you hear about the economy or the war we're involved in?  You mean the ones that are a direct result of Harper's push to war, and his economic policies which are a disaster for 95% of Canada?  I know hindsight is 20/20, but let's look back for a minute.  We aren't in Iraq (directly, anyhow) because of the Liberals, Harper was instrumental in the push to preemptive warfare against a sovereign nation that posed no threat.  We are in Afghanistan, the *right* place to be if we want to combat global terrorism, but not because of Harper.  The only thing Harper had to do with the war in Afghanistan is spend a whopping $22,000,000,000.00 in a couple of years on it and take credit for the whole thing.  The Strategic Council polling shows that a full 61% of Canadians are against the war that he is now pushing to accelerate.  What about Economics?  Perhaps if he had been giving tax breaks to the manufacturing sector in Ontario, instead of to the most profitable companies in the history of the universe, the fundamentals of those areas hardest hit would be stronger.  Manufacturing is a great thing, it spends money on resources (thus sending money to the resource sector of Canada), spends money on skilled labour (sending money to the people of Canada, hopefully to be spent on Canadian houses &amp; goods) and actually produces something of value.  These baubles can be traded all over the world, adding to Canada's GDP.  Or at least, they could have been..
Please take pics, and post somewhere, we're with you in spirit!
I have a great deal of respect for Dennis. He has a few positions I don't agree with but he's honest and he has guts. I'm a Paul supporter also. I sent him money 4 times (first time I ever sent money to a presidential candidate) and I also sent along 50 bucks to Kucinich.
He said he's not running for a second term.
WAKE UP SHEEPLE! THIS IS CLASSIC "GOTCHA" JOURNALISM!
&gt;There is still time for US policymakers to rescue the deal, but not much. Financial markets are no longer just chaotic, but are close to complete collapse. A number of banks, already on the edge, will be pushed that bit closer to the precipice as a result.   What the Telegraph is trying to say is that it wants American taxpayers to fund bad choices made by others, some of whom are overseas.  Yes, it is undoubtedly in the interest of the UK to see US taxpayers doing this.  The value did not "vanish" yesterday.  The value was a reassessment of the state of a number of companies, which was lower than had earlier been thought.  The actual losses happened long ago, over time, as bad debt accrued and was mis-evaluated.  That re-evaluation cannot be simply pushed off forever.  &gt;This is why so many people – and not just the politicians putting the deal together – are warning that if the deal fails entirely we could be facing a second Great Depression.   It's not going to be a Great Depression.  Recession, perhaps, but not a Great Depression.  Furthermore, the bailout was a short-term patch that would not avoid a recession.
Well, she can see Canada from her house, so probably Canadian Bacon is how she likes her pork?
The day the US populace rises up and overthrows the government, I'll concede that you guys were right all along.
Without reading the article, I think it does just that.  Promote trade, without giving up any sovereignty. 
I'm going to name my kids Jimothy, Billbert and Betilda
What you are about to experience is a profoundly new concept to approaching Higher Consciousness. I am going to speak of a meditation that goes beyond normal meditation as most people understand it.
The shades of Scarlet Monastery. 
You know that feeling when you suddenly have a nervous jolt, like when your sleeping in a car and just twitch?  I did that when I saw bacon was a prize.
Yo mama so greasy she use bacon as a band aid!  White girl beaten your ass, junior.
If you want to waste 5 minutes of your life reading claptrap by a high school Republican, check it out.
It's clearly a functional language, in fact it looks like lambda notation. What language is that though?
I was thinking of using a title to do with transformers...but then I thought  WWJD?
Don't worry about it, I totally bybassed the title anyway.
Maybe she was too embarrassed to admit that all she really reads are the daily inspirational emails from Beliefnet.
The PFD and it's amount have nothing to do with the governor.  Sorry to rain facts on your envy parade.  And FYI:  it's not a "state" check in the sense that you're using.  It's more aptly called the "state residents piggy bank interest" check.  But back to the topic...  Alaskans will welcome Sarah back with open arms should she and Senator McCain fail in their bid.  The article is from a former (!) editor of the most hated paper in Alaska.  Partisan?  Check.  Out of touch?  Check.  Liberal?  Check.  And most importantly:  Inaccurate?  Check and mate.  Just to make this clear, I'm a life-long Alaskan and I'm a Christian.  And I'm not voting for Senator McCain.
or maybe there's similar logic at play, that if an organism's mutation is non-beneficial, then it becomes a liability, so should changes in business practices.
...only if they tile [dancing retard baby cgi](http://jp.youtube.com/watch?v=2W4EBoQmWPs) all over the background while she's getting railed...
OK, so I found this blog entry funny. Especially this: "Smacks of totalitarianism, and it makes me uncomfortable.  We fought a revolution over this sort of nonsense."   Call me silly, but suspending habeas corpus for prisoners seems more totalitarian than singing songs about a candidate. If the author is really up in arms about heading towards totalitarianism; the last 8 years must have been driving him crazy.   http://www.csmonitor.com/2006/0919/dailyUpdate.html == totalitarianism.  Children songsinging == normal parental brainwashing of their kids to think what they think. Check any church, it's going on all over.
I think that was Woody Allen.
You owe him a million dollars.
No because I wouldn't know who to vote for. I'd have to do research. I'd have to talk to people in the campaign. I'd have to attend speeches. It's much easier knowing that a McCain Presidency is likely the end of human civilization as we know it  so there's no better candidate than Obama.
Fail!  Corporations haven't even started using forums yet.  
O.M.G. I can totally relate with you. I always solve programming problems while trying to sleep. I just think really clear.
so let me get this straight.. a witness lies and changes their story? and now they are credible? sounds fishy to me.... somebody is ridinnnnnnnnnnn dirtyyyyyyyyyyyyyy!
dead ant dead ant dead ant dead ant dead ant dead annnnnnnnnt...
dirtymoney, there could be a number of reasons for excessive thirst. Just go and have a test. If you *do* have diabeetus, you can decide then whether to ignore the recommendations on diet, but at least you'll know. And, the desire for fast foods in  interesting. You *do* get hooked on them, but if you have a break from them the craving goes away. KFC here have a slogan "can't beat that *taste*!" which I'm sure is designed to keep people in the junk eating zone.
I'm pretty sure you get drunk just stepping foot on the ped mall. 
You can tell because of the terrorist mandible-jab
Funny thing about cheese...  All Other Foods: If mold forms throw it away or die.  Cheese: If mold forms, cut off the mold and eat the delicious formerly moldy cheese.
agreed, to a large extent
ahhh...! &lt;HEADACHE&gt; It cannot be done. Accept it. Pay your damn mortgage or dont take one. And if you cant, sell your house 20 cents on the dollar and move to a third world country and live like a king!
 Why should a bookstore care?
..the grammatical choice of people using the variant pronouncitaion being what I was originally acknowledging; I wasn't confused! However I'm glad there is another alert defender of British English out there!
****pew pew****
Not at the start, but it gets better as it goes along.  After about 1:30 it syncs up.
Small and petty McChicken. Small and petty...
&gt;From everything she's said, I really don't know how she feels about pork.  But we know Bristol's into it. BadaBING!
Why? :-( 
Seawater has electrolytes!  It's what thirsty people crave!
Have you tried atkins? I know a close friend who was quite overweight his whole life who is slim and trim now. There are risks, but you should check it out and weight the pros and cons.
do you have a better idea than "do it, but if it fails, it's your ass." ?
Nope, it looks like the small ones are all there is. But the source of the research is [Australia's CSIRO](http://www.csiro.au/science/CarbonNanotubeYarn.html);  that appears to be the best place to read up on it.
I use "something that may suck, but kind of works" as my immediate goal when I'm coding.  Most of my programming is for research projects and I almost always find when I get something working as expected that the initial results necessitate a change in the approach anyway.  I love Norvig's description of how to implement GPS: The General Problem Solver where he describes the problem, generates a specification and implements it.  He then he leads you through how the code evolves after testing it.  By the end of the day 99% of the crappy code that I originally got working has been yanked out, but I would never get anything done if I didn't get it in there to start with.
It's the fucking warmongering Jews who are setting America to antagonize Russia.  The Jews have never gotten over the fact that Stalin purged their controlling hierarchy in the USSR and set back their psychotic plans for world rule by almost a century.    [It's creatures like THIS who want perpetual war for perpetual profit.](http://www.prisonplanet.com/articles/november2005/301105warparty.htm)   Fuck you, Jews.  Fight your own wars.  Oh, I forgot -  that ragtag Hezbollah outfit stomped your 21st century military into the sidewalk.  You'll just have to stick to sniping 9 year old girls in Gaza.
protip (literally): anal costs more.
It seems as though a lot of these factors are centered around overeating and lack of exercise or are linked very close to one another (i.e. working too much=less time=skipping meals/snacking a lot=slow metabolism)   it's important to become aware of ways to live a healthier life and not let yourself make excuses. Yeah, if you're on vaca... live it up, but take the stairs instead of the elevator. Be aware that your letting yourself go for a couple days and try to compensate with little things. If you're working a lot bring lots of healthy snacks like veggies and a sandwich to work. People say they don't have time to brown bag it, but it takes maybe 10 min. to pack a lunch. Start making dinner with lots of leftovers, like lasagna, so it's even easier.   You have to be disciplined and you have to be very aware of what you are doing/eating and aware of what some healthy alternatives are. It is not hard to incorporate healthy habits into your normal day. 
I wouldn't mistake one for the other. But I still would describe reminiscing about a piece of music as 'hearing' it in my head, because that's the sensation that comes closest to it.
If you provide price subsidies for half of a market, the other half can take more profits.  Remove the subsidies and prices will find the true price. Often lower, that's the justification for subsidies--lower prices would force a company out of business because they're inefficient and deserve to die.
I love Bill Maher. He's a bit abrasive at times but at least he seems to have thought through his beliefs.
The PSP plays videos. What's the big deal? 
Of course John McCain knows Venezuela's not in the Middle East.  He's from a generation that had to actually study geography. No, this isn't stupidity or ignorance (we're not talking about W here).  This is a symptom of mild cognitive impairment (MCI), one of the red flags that a person is developing dementia, probably Alzheimer's disease. http://www.mayoclinic.com/health/mild-cognitive-impairment/DS00553 "According to the American College of Physicians, mild cognitive impairment affects about 20 percent of the population over 70."
As a Welshman, I don't really have any idea about Alaska, and I worry that my perceptions of the place will now be all wrong because of her.
so what. i just barely finished high school and have said the same thing for longer.
Your mama so poor she can't even pay attention.  Move on junior, it's past you bedtime.
And open mayonnaise good for four to six weeks?!? I have condiments older than McCain that I still use...
How about at least mentioning your local paper?  I'd like to see someone try to spin that negatively.
how would you get in the room?
&gt;WASHINGTON (AP) -- In a surprise move to resurrect President Bush's $700 billion Wall Street rescue plan, Senate leaders slated a vote on the measure for Wednesday -- but added a tax cut plan already rejected by the House.  Oh, *boy*.  So we take a bad bill, add something worse to it, and then re-propose it.  Smashing.  &gt;Another Democratic-backed idea would double the property tax deduction taken by people who do not itemize their taxes.   Uh...let's see.  Our big problem is masses of bad debt, of which subprime mortgages are a significant portion, filtering through the system.  And we want to create financial incentives to take out more subprime mortgages?  &gt;Even pressure in favor of the bill from some of the biggest special interests in Washington, including the U.S. Chamber of Commerce and the National Association of Realtors, could not sway enough votes.  Ah, the National Association of Realtors.  Well, that would explain the above tax cut suggestion.
I hear there's a great view with all the Windows in the ISS.
Still going strong: [TASes](http://tasvideos.org/Movies-SNES.html) and [unassisted speedruns](http://speeddemosarchive.com/SuperMetroid.html)
I'll be honest. I can not sir.
I would usually vote this down because I'm sick of U.S. Politics ending up outside the politics subreddit.   In this case I voted it up because I fucking desperately want Obama to win. Since the rest of the world can't vote in your elections, we have to gently nudge you in the right direction.
Not that I think Palin is anything short of retarded, but how many people on reddit read a newspaper everyday?
Closet Reddit reader.
Most of the users there are limited to making rap beats on fruity loops. Nothing wrong with that, but it's not for me. This subreddit has much more useful information covering a wide range of applications. This is much better in my opinion...
Wait... C++?  Typesafe?  You and I must have wildly different definitions of the term.  C++ is many things, but it most definitely is not typesafe.  Or did you just mean that its woefully inadequate type system offers better type safety than C?  Because compared to languages with modern type systems like Haskell or ML, C++ type safety is worthless.
Actually her answer would probably be "Both of them" with "them" being: 1. Today's Pentecostal Evangel 2. Christianity Today
Me too. I sure as hell wasn't one of them (and I disagree with the article because Doom II isn't in it) but it was certainly popular in some circles.
If you think the bailout is a good idea, please send your check to the US gov't.
Or you could just have a peg on each end and tie the rope in a bowline knot so it rotates by itself. You could make the peg large enough that the barrel will fail before it does. 
This is exactly the kind of thing the [this article](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/74g2j/when_he_faces_off_against_sarah_palin_thursday/) is talking about.  She turned a question with a concrete answer into a portrayal of her and her home state of Alaska being thought of as uninformed and uneducated.  I can see many MANY people viewing this clip and instead of thinking, "wow, she doesn't read anything" they think, "that reporter is really being pushy and a bully".  This then leads to the voter believing that the media is against Palin,  in turn this effectively negating any criticism of Palin, no matter how warranted because it can be dismissed as a biased media outlet beating up on a home town girl.  *edit*: changed 'hard answer' to 'concrete answer' for clarification
&gt;+$75
The latter.
There is obviously a way she can prove her point: by example. Show us you personally can choose to be gay for, say, a month, and then choose to be straight again.
Where can I sign up as a tester?
If you havn't bothered to register yet, it means you don't really care, or are informed enough to make an educated choice. In either case, you shouldn't be voting. Its not just a right, its a responsiblity. 
&gt;Warren buffet has come out several times and said his rate is a little over 30%. where are you getting this? Or are you some jackass tool just shooting your mouth off?  You're an idiot.  Warren Buffett doesn't earn a large salary.  Most of his income is from capital gains, which are taxed at 15%.  Even then, what does the rate have to do with how much tax *out of all income taxes collected* they paid?  If the top 1% earned 40% of all income, and paid 10% income tax, and the bottom 99% earned the other 60% and paid the same 10% income tax, *the top 1% would still pay 40% of all taxes, even at a 10% rate*.  &gt;Even if they did, and clearly I don't believe you (you aren't supporting your interjection because you can't), even if they did, they don't pay 40% of ALL taxes, they pay a fuckload less.  Is that even English?  He said *income* taxes specifically.  Oh, and wait, there's this thing called Wikipedia, where you can get cited statistics including:  &gt;The Treasury Department in 2006 reported, based on Internal Revenue Service (IRS) data, the share of federal income taxes paid by taxpayers of various income levels. The data shows the progressive tax structure of the U.S. federal income tax system on individuals that reduces the tax incidence of people with smaller incomes, as they shift the incidence disproportionately to those with higher incomes - the top 0.1% of taxpayers by income pay 17.4% of federal income taxes (earning 9.1% of the income), the top 1% with gross income of $328,049 or more pay 36.9% (earning 19%)  In summation, he *slightly* overstated the percentage, but you need to learn how to read.
The more I think about it, the less this bailout makes any sense.   What this essentially means is that people will have to pay for mortgages, which are worth 20 cents on the dollar, **twice**.   Not a single person will get a reduction in the mortgage amount meaning that they will have to continue to pay these companies. Not a single person will get a tax break as a result of this bailout.  Yet tax payer money is paying for it. Thus if my logic is correct:  Money goes from people to mortgage companies through mortgage payments  Money goes from people to mortgage companies through taxes and bailouts.  Aren't we double paying these companies?  Is there something I am missing?  Why doesn't this makes sense? WHAT THE FUCK!!!!! 
To be fair, I would have to say girls are more public with their feelings. This would imply that for the majority of cases the article was correct. 
(CT | SoM*) &gt; (FF\*)
Do you have a personal trainer? There must be a better way than torturing yourself. Maybe your super hungry all the time and your body is thrown into "I'm starving, so lets store for the crazy famine to come!" mode. I'm no doctor.
Dim the screen starting at a user defined time to make people [sleepy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Light_effects_on_circadian_rhythm).
I'm from MN and this woman is such an embarrasment to our state......like HOW did she ever get in there....didn't her STUPID smile alert anyone?????  I'll just bet that her and Palin are best of friends (oh gag me!_
I first questioned Christianity when I was 7, and heard the story of Babel, and how it supposedly explains why there are different languages in the world. I still remember thinking "Pfft, that sounds like a load of crap".
20 mins from scranton here! And voting for Obama. 
tongue fuck the ass? no thanks!
Just get a lian-li and never buy another case again. They are the best cases money can buy. 
Obama is not just ignorant of the language - the concept of the fundamental gun culture embedded in the United States is completely foreign to him.  (And btw, the term "gun culture" is a positive, good thing - in spite of the insane rantings of gun-grabbers everywhere.)  There is no such thing as "gun reform" unless you mean restoring the full enjoyment of the RKBA unfettered by governmental interference - enjoyment as we had on a state level until around 1910 (the Sullivan Act) and the federal level in 1934 (NFA).  As for McCain you are fairly correct. He - with a few exceptions I find intolerable - has generally supported the RKBA and has cleaned up his act for his presidential run.  And until Palin, guess what? The 7-10 million SINGLE-ISSUE gun voters were demoralized and disinterested.  Now we're not - and we're ALL coming out Election Day, and we're ALL voting against Obama.  Sort of like what happened in 1994 when we slaughtered the Democrats in both the House and Senate for their stupendously stupid AW and Magazine Capacity bans.
high risk, high rewards.....
Yeah it's creepy. I wonder who staged it.  I wonder who filmed it.  Why?
"_I've read most of 'em._" I guess that means Newsweek, People, and US, but not TIME?  "_Any of 'em that have been in front of me._" Oh, like... let me speculate... the John Birch Society's [The New American](http://www.dailykos.com/story/2008/9/18/23642/2892/739/603353) perhaps?
When are you redcoats going to start shooting and hanging the fucks in charge over there?
If the integrity of the system relies on the executable being made from some particular source then you are also trusting the compiler, and if the voting source is in the open it would be possible to introduce a compiler flaw that changes its output specifically for such source.  There needs to be another way of determining if the program output is a lie.
She is truly the master of the non-answer. Completely vapid. The vetting process must have been rigorous. Great choice, McCain! 
Tell that to the Hebrews.
Baby, my three year old is smarter than you. Yo mama so stupid she sold the car for gas money.
And if the contact page is overloaded and the switchboard is overloaded, call them directly:  Senate: (202) 224-xxxx where [extensions listed here (PDF)](http://www.senate.gov/general/resources/pdf/senators_phone_list.pdf)  House: (202) 225-xxxx where [extensions listed here (PDF)](http://clerk.house.gov/member_info/ttd_110.pdf)
Serious question: does he really believe this crap? I mean, is he losing his mind? He's got to know that he's lying, right?
&gt; "and you're on reddit" 0.0000000001% of American society (I am being VERY generous here).  compete.com says that reddit got 2.8 million uniques last month.  About 50% of that are Americans.  The population of the US is about 305,300,000  That means that about .5% of Americans read reddit.
[His](http://www.isdsgn.com/blog/uploaded_images/Mr.Cool-760654.png) are cooler. 
Make Textmate for Linux.  Edit: Hehe, you guys are so predictable. Before I deleted them, I replied to my own comment with the comments "It exists already, it's called Emacs" and "Or Vim".
Naw. I'd prefer some middle ground between socialism and anarchy.
My Mother died of cancer from that smoke.
I supported McCain by voting for him when the primaries rolled around here in California, being a registered Republican and all.  I really thought he was better than Romney, Huckabee, and the rest.  However, I've been planning to cast my final vote for Obama for quite some time and have been quite disgusted with McCain since shortly after he nailed the official nomination. A politician who jokes about destroying people of whom the majority are little more than innocent pawns is not a comedian; that kind of behavior is more akin to that of a sociopathic monster. --- I didn't copy this from the article.  Rather, I added it **to** the article after writing it here.  Thanks for inspiring the words.  Share and enjoy.
The song is the first one released of his second studio album. You Make It Real is the thid single into the album (Songs for You, Truths for Me). This week, it has placed on the position number seven into UK Singles 100 Chart. While in Dutch Top 40 is placed on the position eighteen. The album is available since yesterday. Some songs of the track listing are: The Only Night, Nothing Ever Hurt Like You, If You Don't Wanna Love Me, Love is Hard and Fix The World Up For You. Today, he has confirmed in his website, that he is going to play at this year's Mencap Little Noise Sessions during November. 
They need to do way instain terrorist&gt;
She accidentally the whole magazine industry.
lol @ whole foods brand ranch dressing  You treehugger you.   Edit: I'm not hatin' on 365 brand, I buy it too, I just found it funny that pizza was being dunked into something "healthy"
So you and your mother were pretty close then?
By the time  the other ones die, there will be new ones to fight against. 
Look, ESR is reviewing a book that's as relevant as he is!
I'm an EVDO-A sprint user; tethering, I get, at best, 50ms ping latency.  DSL/Cable gets like 3ms.  Big difference for gaming. Also, I already get 1Mb/s down and ~700Kb/s up; so, WiMax isn't that much better.  I'm in no hurry to upgrade once it becomes available.
why is it Time is one of the few publications that hasn't lost all sense of morality? Reuters, AP, etc all seem to be soap boxing for the bailout.
Excuse me, but you can polish steaming shit *forever* and never turn it into anything respectable.  The quicker you bury it, the better.
OWNED. She's got to resign now right. 
Those god damn crooks!  And Obama is for this? And some of you thought FISA was unforgivable...
The main issue I have is that it will provide a miniscule public benefit but a large private gain, and consequently the way it's been sold is kind of gross.   To hear these people talk, you'd think it would single handedly eliminate the need to buy oil that does not come from Canada or Mexico and halve the price of gas.  Drilling in the ANWR is going to benefit the shit out of Alaskans as their oil revenues constitute most of their state budget. But it's such a tiny sliver of the overall economy it's inconsequential.  However, the worst part is the ridiculous amount of time that they've spent going over this issue. They had a shitfit over the regularly scheduled Congress recess and it's still a big issue, it's mentioned frequently. All this time for something that won't make a difference and will take _seven years_ to have any effect whatsoever.  Is there really, absolutely *nothing else* you could spend time having meaningful conversations over? The war in Iraq and Afghanistan, the slow collapse of Social Security, the inefficient and insufficient Medicaid, the illegal wiretapings, the torture and secret rendition, the skewed department of justice, the list goes on.   I don't know enough about the environmental impact, except that I would say that 8% of the reserve is a bit more than "minimal".   It kills me inside.
The person on the bottom bunk winds up lying on the sofa. The person on the top bunk winds up under the sofa, tied to the underside, facing the ground.   
Including tax in retail prices causes citizens to forget just how much money their government is taking from them. It's a bad thing.
Upmodded for crediting the original photographers.
The only person that doesn't realize Criss Angel is a laughing stock is Criss Angel.  Real magicians (i.e., the ones who don't rely on camera tricks and stooges) consider him worse than a third-rate kid show magician.  It should be said, however, that a magically-themed Cirque show makes a lot of sense.  What made zero sense was using Criss Angel.  _
I've thought, since the beginning of this election cycle, that there should have been a Dennis Kucinich/Ron Paul Democratic ticket.  I can dream, can't I? 
AN HERO
Now if only we could find a lawn type material that would KEEP THOSE DAMN KIDS OFF MY LAWN!
I'll concede that the writing is ambiguous.  But it hardly makes sense to "pluck" them in the morning.  
Of course there is a media blackout, because showing this will only energize the average person and show that they are not alone - which is bad for the status quo. 
It's this kind of thing that really makes me proud to be a crab.
liberal? Guess you don't live here. It's filled with old people and hicks that wear crocs as accpetable footwear. Our motto is "Not in my backyeard!" We're that progressive.
&gt;I doubt most of the people complaining about it could, either. In fact, I doubt most of the people complaining about it on this thread have listened to anything from the album.  Quoted for truth.
Is it because he's a Democrat?
I've always voted Republican, but if they seriously think we are stupid enough to vote for John McCain / Sarah Palin they are out of their mind. If they think we are stupid enough to vote for Obama / Biden because its the only other choice, they are out of their mind.
So then, Americans? *braces for a downmod storm*
Way to have a take. Rack this comment. 
22 pounds.
This comment belongs in the "Comment belongs in WW2" subreddit. 
&gt; Keep it up shitbirds - you'll find out exactly what the 2nd Amendment is for.  For abandoning any attempt to fix things through legal and democratic means and instead resorting to violence? (or at least big-man talk about using guns to overthrow the government at some distant future time that never actually comes) Meanwhile, you're going to vote for someone who will wreck the country even more.
This is not the first commercially viable nanotubes. Others are further along on their way to market.  What seems significant about this is that the articles seem to imply these tubes aren't limited by length, whereas every other nanotube product i have heard of so far is.   But then the problem is it doesn't seem they have quite solves the brittleness problem. 5X still isn't quite strong enough.
Maybe, but they had no official captain that season.
Of the four (McCain, Palin, Obama, Biden) I'd say that he has shown the least skill at connecting with people on an emotional level at least during this campaign.
Isn't that what he said? "A recession that will last for years?"
And... ?
It's like a real life Doug from Weeds!
Why is this being upvoted?
Ummm, because there was no practical battery for the job. The average real world range of the Rav 4 EV with NMH batteries was about 15 miles.
Yeah, that was half-assed.  Has her hometown listed as Sandpoint, Idaho but she has somehow never been there.
you should get out more and actually interact with others that don't share your political views.  you may be amazed at how much you have in common with those "fucktards".
Finally, a perfect opportunity to use that. Well played.
Que up about a dozen people saying "Hi I'm a GOP.", "... and I'm a GOP, and I'm trying to destroy this."
You were only off by 16% or so on your call.  I've seen worse.
That's what you get for refusing to confess.  I'm sick and tired of witches whining about being submerged in water.  This method has been tried and tested for centuries; every time a witch claims innocence, it turns out she's lying.
The economy artificially took off toward the end of the 90s based on a LOT of bullshit cover your ass Y2K spending. The explosion of the internet was a great area of growth that cannot be denied.   That being said the recession in 2001 (which was TINY) was obviously on its way, just the same as the next president is going to get a nice piece of shit to work with once they take office. Clinton did a lot of things well. He's significantly more moderate than most conservatives like to admit. They're going to probably pay the price for their massive failures by giving up congress and the presidency. Not to mention the local stigma on Republicans in moderate areas of the country (like Oregon where they are trying to put GOP next to their name instead of Republican).   I've only had 2 democratic presidents in my lifetime. I would take either of them over any of the republican presidents in a heartbeat.
Have you said it on Youtube?
which will make the drum impossible to stand on one end and stack on top of each other
&gt;*I'm not even going to bother voting because if you wants things done right you have to do it yourself not rely on somebody in a white house to make things better*  I think you should re-think that.  Yes, you should rely on yourself to get you a nice house or a bigger TV, But you can't rely on yourself to fix the economy, or end wars... I mean, don't waste your vote like that, it just seems silly.
It helps me win debates in the same way covering your body with Vaseline helps you win wrestling matches. 
To be fair... not under oath, the witness said one thing.  While under oath, and penalty of perjury, they were presented with evidence their statement was not true.  Yeah... not the most credible witness, but if there were questions to the veracity of the evidence, they just got a lot quieter.
[This stuff](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Munchies_\(snack_mix\)).  It's a bunch of chips/pretzels/cereals  covered with some kind of cheap (although tasty) flavor powder that's ridiculously expensive for the small bag you get.  And no amount of good bud would make up for the stomachache it leaves you with.
I don't think it has much to do with her being a woman. It has to do with her being a dumb blonde beauty contestant that barely made it through college.   Nobody did anything like this for Hilary did they?
Hooooly SHIT, that's bad.
But I'm still confused, if I don't have enough money I should buy it right?  I mean thats what the commercials on TV say.
You know, I'd like it if you paid attention to my post, instead of my name. Show some maturity. 
The more I talk to you, the more I'm convinced you aren't anywhere near as smart as you think you are. I'm getting tired of having to explain things that should be obvious. The point here is that if you only have 10 apples, how can you choose a banana? There aren't any countries in the world that subscribe to my philosophy. Should I just sit here and cry, or do my best regardless? Most people have the same choice to make. People will do the best with what they have. That doesn't mean the Canadian system is better than a free system, hence, "put a free country in the middle of Ontario and watch it thrive."  And that's irrelevant to my point about the risk of abuse, the fact is, the bigger the government, the more damage Bush can do. I said many times the libertarian model is not just about economics, it's about freedom. Maybe you have never experienced the crushing pains of oppression, you are luckier than most. Freedom has been the exception throughout human history -- that doesn't mean it's bad.
Here's the first couple paragraphs from the bio:  Sing for Change chronicles a recent Sunday afternoon, when 22 children, ages 5-12, gathered to sing original songs in the belief that their singing would lift up our communities for the coming election. Light, hope, courage and love shine through these nonvoting children who believe that their very best contribution to the Obama campaign is to sing.  Sing for Change was a confluence of hard work, good will, and shared vision. Inspired by ideas raised at a grassroots Obama fundraiser, a music teacher, Kathy Sawada, and the children composed and rehearsed the songs in less than two weeks. Several musicians heard of the effort and volunteered to accompany the children. Parents and older siblings designed and provided the T-Shirts and the banner. There's a first for everything, but rarely do so many firsts come together at once: for the children and their parents, this is their first performance, first video, first banner, and first involvement with grassroots work on a presidential campaign.
No pool?
Let's hope it rings true! I love it when the lights come on, the vermin just scurry!
Sure.  I read The Outback and The Daily Roo. Daily!
I had a VP6. Loved that one. Dual Pentium III 933's running Win 2000 and RHL.
Leaked photos from the set of the next David Lynch film.
&gt;Yeah, that was half-assed. Has her hometown listed as Sandpoint, Idaho but she has somehow never been there.
Validates the suspicion that asking Congress for the money was a thinly veiled attempt to push more power into the executive branch.
Posting a video of the Orginal bet as a citation does not prove whether the bet has been paid or not since then.
umm, what?
One subpar season doesn't make a goalie "suck". Luongo has been a remarkable player throughout his career, despite playing behind some rather unsuccessful teams.
I won't say, and you didn't read it, but there will be a lot more then protesting if....
Actually, no.  Committing suicide is no doubt benefiting his siblings, which are highly likely to contain copies of the sacrificial ant's genes.  His gene may cause him to commit suicide in order to benefit many, many more copies of his genes in the form of the rest of the colony.  
Okay that's pushing the bullshit too far, this headline is totally false; just because she DIDN'T name one doesn't mean she CAN'T. She clearly knows the name of at least one "that she has EVER read in her life", please stfu with this nonsense.
oh my god!  she's not shitting.  somebody call somebody.
And her daughter needs massive cocks asap.  About 9,000 to be exact.
McCain (R-AZ), Not Voting HURR HURR
I bet I could go to 100 colleges in 6 years.
Maybe they'd hate each other, but they could still work toward a common goal. They could still debate each other. I'd bet they could even work as President/Vice President. I'm sure it wouldn't be the first time two people who hated each other worked closely in the White House.
You made a blanket assertion that "there is no profit incentive to work on unpatentable drugs"   I invoked an existence proof that this is not true with a case in the free market.  Aspirin is not patented, I can make it at home and sell it.  But not for medical purposes, due the heavy regulations.  Are you saying there is no profit in dispensing and charging for aspirin then?
I didn't say call your lawyer.  I said to tell them you would. This actually works quite well.  I had a similar issue once that was resolved by a nasty phone call.  The previous tenant to my apartment neglected to inform the power company that they'd moved.  I moved in, set up a new power service. I started getting letters for the previous tenant.  They started showing up with ugly messages on the front.  "Final Notice".  "Will disconnect you."  "Do you know where your children are?  We do..."  Despite calling them multiple times, they continued to send threatening letters. After the last one, I called them up and told them that if they came by and turned off the power, I was going to sue them into oblivion.  I was paying my service, and don't give a rat's ass about this other fellow. They apologized and I never got another disconnection letter again. Total lawyer fees?  $0.
I"m not saying it was a great decision but I heard him speak about it and he says the 11 year old asked to be tasered, he put down cushions on the floor and there were several family members around when he did it. He also put it at the lowest setting.  So it's just very crazy and not completely batshit insane crazy.
Finally Justin Long will get what's coming to him.
two lips one bulb?
